Ohio, session 136, SB147.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That sections 343.01, 343.011, 343.012, 343.022, 343.08, 3714.07, 3714.073,
ECTION
3734.521, 3734.53, 3734.56, 3734.57, 3734.574, and 3745.015 be amended and section 3734.522 of
the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows:
Sec. 343.01. (A) In order to comply with division (B) of section 3734.52 of the Revised
Code, the board of county commissioners of each county shall do one of the following:
(1) Establish, by resolution, and maintain a county solid waste management district under
this chapter that consists of all the incorporated and unincorporated territory within the county
except as otherwise provided in division (A) of this section;
(2) With the boards of county commissioners of one or more other counties establish, by
agreement, and maintain a joint solid waste management district under this chapter that consists of
all the incorporated and unincorporated territory within the counties forming the joint district except
as otherwise provided in division (A) of this section.
If a municipal corporation is located in more than one solid waste management district, the
entire municipal corporation shall be considered to be included in and shall be under the jurisdiction
of the district in which a majority of the population of the municipal corporation resides.
A county and joint district established to comply with division (B) of section 3734.52 of the
Revised Code shall have a population of not less than one hundred twenty thousand unless, in the
instance of a county district, the board of county commissioners has obtained an exemption from
that requirement under division (C)(1) or (2) of that section. Each joint district established to comply
with an order issued under division (D) of that section shall have a population of at least one
hundred twenty thousand.
(B) The boards of county commissioners of the counties establishing a joint district
constitute, collectively, the board of directors of the joint district, except that if a county with a form
of legislative authority other than a board of county commissioners participates, it shall be
represented on the board of directors by three persons appointed by the legislative authority.

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
2
The agreement to establish and maintain a joint district shall be ratified by resolution of the
board of county commissioners of each participating county. Upon ratification, the board of
directors shall take control of and manage the joint district subject to this chapter, except that, in the
case of a joint district formed pursuant to division (C)(B), (D)(C), or (E) (D) of section 343.012 of
the Revised Code, the board of directors shall take control of and manage the district when the
formation of the district becomes final under the applicable division. A majority of the board of
directors constitutes a quorum, and a majority vote is required for the board to act.
A county participating in a joint district may contribute lands or rights or interests therein,
money, other personal property or rights or interests therein, or services to the district. The
agreement shall specify any contributions of participating counties and the rights of the participating
counties in lands or personal property, or rights or interests therein, contributed to or otherwise
acquired by the joint district. The agreement may be amended or added to by a majority vote of the
board of directors, but no amendment or addition shall divest a participating county of any right or
interest in lands or personal property without its consent.
The board of directors may appoint and fix the compensation of employees of, accept gifts,
devises, and bequests for, and take other actions necessary to control and manage the joint district.
Employees of the district shall be considered county employees for the purposes of Chapter 124. of
the Revised Code and other provisions of state law applicable to employees. Instead of or in addition
to appointing employees of the district, the board of directors may agree to use employees of one or
more of the participating counties in the service of the joint district and to share in their
compensation in any manner that may be agreed upon.
The board of directors shall do one of the following:
(1) Designate the county auditor, including any other official acting in a capacity similar to a
county auditor under a county charter, of a county participating in the joint district as the fiscal
officer of the district, and the county treasurer, or other official acting in a capacity similar to a
county treasurer under a county charter, of that county as the treasurer of the district. The designated
county officials shall perform any applicable duties for the district as each typically performs for the
county of which the individual is an official, except as otherwise may be provided in any bylaws or
resolutions adopted by the board of directors. The board of directors may pay to that county any
amount agreed upon by the board of directors and the board of county commissioners of that county
to reimburse that county for the cost properly allocable to the service of its officials as fiscal officer
and treasurer of the joint district.
(2) Appoint one individual who is neither a county auditor nor a county treasurer, and who
may be an employee of the district, to serve as both the treasurer of the district and its fiscal officer.
That individual shall act as custodian of the funds of the board and the district and shall maintain all
accounts of the district. Any reference in this chapter or Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code to a
county auditor or county treasurer serving as fiscal officer of a district or custodian of any funds of a
board or district is deemed to refer to an individual appointed under division (B)(2) of this section.

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
3
The fiscal officer of a district shall establish a general fund and any other necessary funds for
the district.
(C) A board of county commissioners of a county district or board of directors of a joint
district may acquire, by purchase or lease, construct, improve, enlarge, replace, maintain, and
operate such solid waste collection systems within their respective districts and such solid waste
facilities within or outside their respective districts as are necessary for the protection of the public
health. A board of county commissioners may acquire within its county real property or any estate,
interest, or right therein, by appropriation or any other method, for use by a county or joint district in
connection with such facilities. Appropriation proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with
sections 163.01 to 163.22 of the Revised Code.
(D) The sanitary engineer or sanitary engineering department of a county maintaining a
district and any sanitary engineer or sanitary engineering department of a county in a joint district, as
determined by the board of directors, in addition to other duties assigned to that engineer or
department, shall assist the board of county commissioners or directors in the performance of their
duties under this chapter and sections 3734.52 to 3734.575 of the Revised Code and shall be charged
with any other duties and services in relation thereto that the board prescribes. A board may employ
registered professional engineers to assist the sanitary engineer in those duties and also may employ
financial advisers and any other professional services it considers necessary to assist it in the
construction, financing, and maintenance of solid waste collection or other solid waste facilities.
Such contracts of employment shall not require the certificate provided in section 5705.41 of the
Revised Code. Payment for such services may be made from the general fund or any other fund
legally available for that use at times that are agreed upon or as determined by the board of county
commissioners or directors, and the funds may be reimbursed from the proceeds of bonds or notes
issued to pay the cost of any improvement to which the services related.
(E)(1) The prosecuting attorney of the county shall serve as the legal advisor of a county
district and shall provide such services to the board of county commissioners of the district as are
required or authorized to be provided to other county boards under Chapter 309. of the Revised
Code, except that, if the board considers it to be necessary or appropriate, the board, on its own
initiative, may employ an attorney or other legal counsel on an annual basis to serve as the legal
advisor of the district in place of the prosecuting attorney. When the prosecuting attorney is serving
as the district's legal advisor and the board considers it to be necessary or appropriate, the board, on
its own initiative, may employ an attorney or other legal counsel to represent or advise the board
regarding a particular matter in place of the prosecuting attorney. The employment of an attorney or
other legal counsel on an annual basis or in a particular matter is not subject to or governed by
sections 305.14 and 309.09 of the Revised Code.
Notwithstanding the employment of an attorney or other legal counsel on an annual basis to
serve as the district's legal advisor, the board may require written opinions or instructions from the
prosecuting attorney under section 309.09 of the Revised Code in matters connected with its official

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
4
duties as though the prosecuting attorney were serving as the legal advisor of the district.
(2) The board of directors of a joint district may designate the prosecuting attorney of one of
the counties forming the district to serve as the legal advisor of the district. When so designated, the
prosecuting attorney shall provide such services to the joint district as are required or authorized to
be provided to county boards under Chapter 309. of the Revised Code. The board of directors may
pay to that county any amount agreed upon by the board of directors and the board of county
commissioners of that county to reimburse that county for the cost properly allocable to the services
of its prosecuting attorney as the legal advisor of the joint district. When that prosecuting attorney is
so serving and the board considers it to be necessary or appropriate, the board, on its own initiative,
may employ an attorney or other legal counsel to represent or advise the board regarding a particular
matter in place of the prosecuting attorney.
Instead of designating the prosecuting attorney of one of the counties forming the district to
be the legal advisor of the district, the board of directors may employ on an annual basis an attorney
or other legal counsel to serve as the district's legal advisor. Notwithstanding the employment of an
attorney or other legal counsel as the district's legal advisor, the board of directors may require
written opinions or instructions from the prosecuting attorney of any of the counties forming the
district in matters connected with the board's official duties, and the prosecuting attorney shall
provide the written opinion or instructions as though the prosecuting attorney had been designated to
serve as the district's legal advisor under division (E)(2) of this section.
(F) A board of county commissioners may issue bonds or bond anticipation notes of the
county to pay the cost of preparing general and detailed plans and other data required for the
construction of solid waste facilities in connection with a county or joint district. A board of
directors of a joint solid waste management district may issue bonds or bond anticipation notes of
the joint solid waste management district to pay the cost of preparing general and detailed plans and
other data required for the construction of solid waste facilities in connection with a joint district.
The bonds and notes shall be issued in accordance with Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, except
that the maximum maturity of bonds issued for that purpose shall not exceed ten years. Bond
anticipation notes may be paid from the proceeds of bonds issued either to pay the cost of the solid
waste facilities or to pay the cost of the plans and other data.
(G) To the extent authorized by the solid waste management plan of the district approved
under section 3734.521 or 3734.55 of the Revised Code or subsequent amended plans of the district
approved under section 3734.521 or 3734.56 of the Revised Code, the board of county
commissioners of a county district or board of directors of a joint district may adopt, publish, and
enforce rules doing any of the following:
(1) Prohibiting or limiting the receipt of solid wastes generated outside the district or outside
a service area prescribed in the solid waste management plan or amended plan, at facilities located
within the solid waste management district, consistent with the projections contained in the plan or
amended plan under divisions (A)(6) and (7) of section 3734.53 of the Revised Code. However,

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
5
rules adopted by a board under division (G)(1) of this section may be adopted and enforced with
respect to solid waste disposal facilities in the solid waste management district that are not owned by
a county or the solid waste management district only if the board submits an application to the
director of environmental protection that demonstrates that there is insufficient capacity to dispose
of all solid wastes that are generated within the district at the solid waste disposal facilities located
within the district and the director approves the application. The demonstration in the application
shall be based on projections contained in the plan or amended plan of the district. The director shall
establish the form of the application. The approval or disapproval of such an application by the
director is an action that is appealable under section 3745.04 of the Revised Code.
In addition, the director of environmental protection may issue an order modifying a rule
adopted under division (G)(1) of this section to allow the disposal in the district of solid wastes from
another county or joint solid waste management district if all of the following apply:
(a) The district in which the wastes were generated does not have sufficient capacity to
dispose of solid wastes generated within it for six months following the date of the director's order.
(b) No new solid waste facilities will begin operation during those six months in the district
in which the wastes were generated and, despite good faith efforts to do so, it is impossible to site
new solid waste facilities within the district because of its high population density.
(c) The district in which the wastes were generated has made good faith efforts to negotiate
with other districts to incorporate its disposal needs within those districts' solid waste management
plans, including efforts to develop joint facilities authorized under section 343.02 of the Revised
Code, and the efforts have been unsuccessful.
(d) The district in which the wastes were generated has located a facility willing to accept
the district's solid wastes for disposal within the receiving district.
(e) The district in which the wastes were generated has demonstrated to the director that the
conditions specified in divisions (G)(1)(a) to (d) of this section have been met.
(f) The director finds that the issuance of the order will be consistent with the state solid
waste management plan and that receipt of the out-of-district wastes will not limit the capacity of the
receiving district to dispose of its in-district wastes to less than eight years.
Any order issued under division (G)(1) of this section shall not become final until thirty days
after it has been served upon the county or joint solid waste management district that will receive the
out-of-district wastes either by certified mail or, if the director has record of an internet identifier of
record associated with the district, by ordinary mail and by that internet identifier of record.
(2) Governing the maintenance, protection, and use of solid waste collection or other solid
waste facilities located within its district. The rules adopted under division (G)(2) of this section
shall not establish design standards for solid waste facilities and shall be consistent with the solid
waste provisions of Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under those provisions.
The rules adopted under division (G)(2) of this section may prohibit any person, municipal
corporation, township, or other political subdivision from constructing, enlarging, or modifying any

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
6
solid waste facility until general plans and specifications for the proposed improvement have been
submitted to and approved by the board of county commissioners or board of directors as complying
with the solid waste management plan or amended plan of the district. The construction of such a
facility shall be done under the supervision of the county sanitary engineer or, in the case of a joint
district, a county sanitary engineer designated by the board of directors, and any person, municipal
corporation, township, or other political subdivision proposing or constructing such improvements
shall pay to the county or joint district all expenses incurred by the board in connection therewith.
The sanitary engineer may enter upon any public or private property for the purpose of making
surveys or examinations necessary for designing solid waste facilities or for supervising the
construction, enlargement, modification, or operation of any such facilities. No person, municipal
corporation, township, or other political subdivision shall forbid or interfere with the sanitary
engineer or the sanitary engineer's authorized assistants entering upon such property for that
purpose. If actual damage is done to property by the making of the surveys and examinations, a
board shall pay the reasonable value of that damage to the owner of the property damaged, and the
cost shall be included in the financing of the improvement for which the surveys and examinations
are made.
(3) Governing the development and implementation of a program for the inspection of solid
wastes generated outside the boundaries of this state that are disposed of at solid waste facilities
included in the district's solid waste management plan or amended plan. A board of county
commissioners or board of directors or its authorized representative may enter upon the premises of
any solid waste facility included in the district's solid waste management plan or amended plan for
the purpose of conducting the inspections required or authorized by the rules adopted under division
(G)(3) of this section. No person, municipal corporation, township, or other political subdivision
shall forbid or interfere with a board of county commissioners or directors or its authorized
representative entering upon the premises of any such solid waste facility for that purpose.
(4) Exempting the owner or operator of any existing or proposed solid waste facility
provided for in the plan or amended plan from compliance with any amendment to a township
zoning resolution adopted under section 519.12 of the Revised Code or to a county rural zoning
resolution adopted under section 303.12 of the Revised Code that rezoned or redistricted the parcel
or parcels upon which the facility is to be constructed or modified and that became effective within
two years prior to the filing of an application for a permit required under division (A)(2)(a) of
section 3734.05 of the Revised Code to open a new or modify an existing solid waste facility.
(H) A board of county commissioners or board of directors may enter into a contract with
any person, municipal corporation, township, or other political subdivision for the operation and
maintenance of any solid waste facilities regardless of whether the facilities are owned or leased by
the county or joint district or the contractor.
(I)(1) No person, municipal corporation, township, or other political subdivision shall tamper
with or damage any solid waste facility constructed under this chapter or any apparatus or accessory

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
7
connected therewith or pertaining thereto, fail or refuse to comply with the applicable rules adopted
by a board of county commissioners or directors under division (G)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section,
refuse to permit an inspection or examination by a sanitary engineer as authorized under division (G)
(2) of this section, or refuse to permit an inspection by a board of county commissioners or directors
or its authorized representative as required or authorized by rules adopted under division (G)(3) of
this section.
(2) If the board of county commissioners of a county district or board of directors of a joint
district has established facility designations under section 343.013, 343.014, or 343.015 of the
Revised Code, or the director has established facility designations in the initial or amended plan of
the district prepared and ordered to be implemented under section 3734.521, 3734.55, or 3734.56 of
the Revised Code, no person, municipal corporation, township, or other political subdivision shall
deliver, or cause the delivery of, any solid wastes generated within a county or joint district to any
solid waste facility other than the facility designated under section 343.013, 343.014, or 343.015 of
the Revised Code, or in the initial or amended plan of the district prepared and ordered to be
implemented under section 3734.521, 3734.55, or 3734.56 of the Revised Code, as applicable,
except that source separated recyclable materials may be taken to any legitimate recycling facility.
Upon the request of a person or the legislative authority of a municipal corporation or township, the
board of county commissioners of a county district or board of directors of a joint district may grant
a waiver authorizing the delivery of all or any portion of the solid wastes generated in a municipal
corporation or township to a solid waste facility other than the facility designated under section
343.013, 343.014, or 343.015 of the Revised Code, or in the initial or amended plan of the district
prepared and ordered to be implemented under section 3734.521, 3734.55, or 3734.56 of the Revised
Code, as applicable, regardless of whether the other facility is located within or outside of the
district, if the board finds that delivery of those solid wastes to the other facility is not inconsistent
with the projections contained in the district's initial or amended plan under divisions (A)(6) and (7)
of section 3734.53 of the Revised Code as approved or ordered to be implemented and will not
adversely affect the implementation and financing of the district's initial or amended plan pursuant
to the implementation schedule contained in it under divisions (A)(12)(a) to (d) of that section. The
board shall act on a request for such a waiver within ninety days after receiving the request. Upon
granting such a waiver, the board shall send notice of that fact to the director. The notice shall
indicate to whom the waiver was granted. Any waiver or authorization granted by a board on or
before October 29, 1993, shall continue in force until the board takes action concerning the same
entity under this division or until action is taken under division (G) of section 343.014 of the
Revised Code.
(J) Divisions (G)(1) to (4) and (I)(2) of this section do not apply to the construction,
operation, use, repair, enlargement, or modification of either of the following:
(1) A solid waste facility owned by a generator of solid wastes when the solid waste facility
exclusively disposes of solid wastes generated at one or more premises owned by the generator

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
8
regardless of whether the facility is located on a premises where the wastes are generated;
(2) A facility that exclusively disposes of wastes that are generated from the combustion of
coal, or from the combustion of primarily coal in combination with scrap tires, that is not combined
in any way with garbage at one or more premises owned by the generator.
(K)(1) A member of the board of county commissioners of a county solid waste management
district, member of the board of directors of a joint solid waste management district, member of the
board of trustees of a regional solid waste management authority managing a county or joint solid
waste management district, or officer or employee of any solid waste management district, for the
purposes of sections 102.03, 102.04, 2921.41, and 2921.42 of the Revised Code, shall not be
considered to be directly or indirectly interested in, or improperly influenced by, any of the
following:
(a) A contract entered into under this chapter or section 307.15 or sections 3734.52 to
3734.575 of the Revised Code between the district and any county forming the district, municipal
corporation or township located within the district, or health district having territorial jurisdiction
within the district, of which that member, officer, or employee also is an officer or employee, but
only to the extent that any interest or influence could arise from holding public office or employment
with the political subdivision or health district;
(b) A contract entered into under this chapter or section 307.15 or sections 3734.52 to
3734.575 of the Revised Code between the district and a county planning commission organized
under section 713.22 of the Revised Code, or regional planning commission created under section
713.21 of the Revised Code, having territorial jurisdiction within the district, of which that member
also is a member, officer, or employee, but only to the extent that any interest or influence could
arise from holding public office or employment with the commission;
(c) An expenditure of money made by the district for the benefit of any county forming the
district, municipal corporation or township located within the district, or health district or county or
regional planning commission having territorial jurisdiction within the district, of which that
member also is a member, officer, or employee, but only to the extent that any interest or influence
could arise from holding public office or employment with the political subdivision, health district,
or commission;
(d) An expenditure of money made for the benefit of the district by any county forming the
district, municipal corporation or township located within the district, or health district or county or
regional planning commission having territorial jurisdiction within the district, of which that
member also is a member, officer, or employee, but only to the extent that any interest or influence
could arise from holding public office or employment with the political subdivision, health district,
or commission.
(2) A solid waste management district, county, municipal corporation, township, health
district, or planning commission described or referred to in divisions (K)(1)(a) to (d) of this section
shall not be construed to be the business associate of a person who is concurrently a member of the

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
9
board of county commissioners, directors, or trustees, or an officer or employee, of the district and
an officer or employee of that municipal corporation, county, township, health district, or planning
commission for the purposes of sections 102.03, 2921.42, and 2921.43 of the Revised Code. Any
person who is concurrently a member of the board of county commissioners, directors, or trustees, or
an officer or employee, of a solid waste management district so described or referred to and an
officer or employee of a county, municipal corporation, township, health district, or planning
commission so described or referred to may participate fully in deliberations concerning and vote on
or otherwise participate in the approval or disapproval of any contract or expenditure of funds
described in those divisions as a member of the board of county commissioners or directors, or an
officer or employee, of a county or joint solid waste management district; member of the board of
trustees, or an officer or employee, of a regional solid waste management authority managing a
county or joint solid waste management district; member of the legislative authority, or an officer or
employee, of a county forming the district; member of the legislative authority, or an officer or
employee, of a municipal corporation or township located within the district; member of the board of
health, or an officer or employee, of a health district having territorial jurisdiction within the district;
or member of the planning commission, or an officer or employee of a county or regional planning
commission having territorial jurisdiction within the district.
(3) Nothing in division (K)(1) or (2) of this section shall be construed to exempt any member
of the board of county commissioners, directors, or trustees, or an officer or employee, of a solid
waste management district from a conflict of interest arising because of a personal or private
business interest.
(4) A member of the board of county commissioners of a county solid waste management
district, board of directors of a joint solid waste management district, or board of trustees of a
regional solid waste management authority managing a county or joint solid waste management
district, or an officer or employee, of any such solid waste management district, neither shall be
disqualified from holding any other public office or position of employment nor be required to
forfeit any other public office or position of employment by reason of serving as a member of the
board of county commissioners, directors, or trustees, or as an officer or employee, of the district,
notwithstanding any requirement to the contrary under the common law of this state or the Revised
Code.
(L) As used in this chapter:
(1) "Board of health," "disposal," "health district," "scrap tires," and "solid waste transfer
facility" have the same meanings as in section 3734.01 of the Revised Code.
(2) "Change in district composition" and "change" have the same meaning as in section
3734.521 of the Revised Code.
(3)(a) Except as provided in division (L)(3)(b) or (c), and (d), of this section, "solid wastes"
has the same meaning as in section 3734.01 of the Revised Code.
(b) If the solid waste management district is not one that resulted from proceedings for a

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
10
change in district composition under sections 343.012 and 3734.521 of the Revised Code, until such
time as an amended solid waste management plan is approved under section 3734.56 of the Revised
Code, "solid wastes" need not include scrap tires unless the solid waste management policy
committee established under section 3734.54 of the Revised Code for the district chooses to include
the management of scrap tires in the district's initial solid waste management plan prepared under
sections 3734.54 and 3734.55 of the Revised Code.
(c) If the solid waste management district is one resulting from proceedings for a change in
district composition under sections 343.012 and 3734.521 of the Revised Code and if the change
involves an existing district that is operating under either an initial solid waste management plan
approved or prepared and ordered to be implemented under section 3734.55 of the Revised Code or
an initial or amended plan approved or prepared and ordered to be implemented under section
3734.521 of the Revised Code that does not provide for the management of scrap tires and scrap tire
facilities, until such time as the amended plan of the district resulting from the change is approved
under section 3734.56 of the Revised Code, "solid wastes" need not include scrap tires unless the
solid waste management policy committee established under division (C) of section 3734.521 of the
Revised Code for the district chooses to include the management of scrap tires in the district's initial
or amended solid waste management plan prepared under section 3734.521 of the Revised Code in
connection with the change proceedings.
(d) If the policy committee chooses to include the management of scrap tires in an initial
plan prepared under sections 3734.54 and 3734.55 of the Revised Code or in an initial or amended
plan prepared under section 3734.521 of the Revised Code, the board of county commissioners or
directors shall execute all of the duties imposed and may exercise any or all of the rights granted
under this section for the purpose of managing solid wastes that consist of scrap tires.
(4)(a) Except as provided in division (L)(4)(b) or (c), and (d) of this section, "facility" has
the same meaning as in section 3734.01 of the Revised Code and also includes any solid waste
transfer, recycling, or resource recovery facility.
(b) If the solid waste management district is not one that resulted from proceedings for a
change in district composition under sections 343.012 and 3734.521 of the Revised Code, until such
time as an amended solid waste management plan is approved under section 3734.56 of the Revised
Code, "facility" need not include any scrap tire collection, storage, monocell, monofill, or recovery
facility unless the solid waste management policy committee established under section 3734.54 of
the Revised Code for the district chooses to include the management of scrap tire facilities in the
district's initial solid waste management plan prepared under sections 3734.54 and 3734.55 of the
Revised Code.
(c) If the solid waste management district is one resulting from proceedings for a change in
district composition under sections 343.012 and 3734.521 of the Revised Code and if the change
involves an existing district that is operating under either an initial solid waste management plan
approved under section 3734.55 of the Revised Code or an initial or amended plan approved or

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
11
prepared and ordered to be implemented under section 3734.521 of the Revised Code that does not
provide for the management of scrap tires and scrap tire facilities, until such time as the amended
plan of the district resulting from the change is approved under section 3734.56 of the Revised Code,
"facility" need not include scrap tires unless the solid waste management policy committee
established under division (C) of section 3734.521 of the Revised Code for the district chooses to
include the management of scrap tires in the district's initial or amended solid waste management
plan prepared under section 3734.521 of the Revised Code in connection with the change
proceedings.
(d) If the policy committee chooses to include the management of scrap tires in an initial
plan prepared under sections 3734.54 and 3734.55 of the Revised Code or in an initial or amended
plan prepared under section 3734.521 of the Revised Code, the board of county commissioners or
directors shall execute all of the duties imposed and may exercise any or all of the rights granted
under this section for the purpose of managing solid waste facilities that are scrap tire collection,
storage, monocell, monofill, or recovery facilities.
(M) As used in this section:
(1) "Source separated recyclable materials" means materials that are separated from other
solid wastes at the location where the materials are generated for the purpose of recycling the
materials at a legitimate recycling facility.
(2) "Legitimate recycling facility" has the same meaning as in rule 3745-27-01 of the
Administrative Code.
(3) "Internet identifier of record" has the same meaning as in section 9.312 of the Revised
Code.
Sec. 343.011. (A) The board of county commissioners of a county or the board of directors
of a joint solid waste management district established under this chapter, upon its own initiative or at
the request of the legislative authority of any municipal corporation or township located in the
district, may adopt a resolution proposing the formation of a regional solid waste management
authority for the purpose of executing all the duties and responsibilities imposed on or granted to the
board under this chapter. Upon adoption of such a resolution, the board shall send a copy of it to the
legislative authority of each municipal corporation and township located in the district and shall
request each legislative authority to vote on the question of the formation of such a regional
authority.
The board of county commissioners or board of directors shall declare the proposal to have
been adopted upon determining that the legislative authorities of a combination of municipal
corporations and townships with a combined population within the boundaries of the district
comprising at least sixty per cent of the total population of the district have approved the proposal,
provided that that combination shall include the municipal corporation having the largest population
in each county within the boundaries of the district. Upon the adoption of the proposal, the board of
county commissioners or board of directors shall enter into an agreement with the legislative

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
12
authorities of the municipal corporations and townships in the district to form a regional solid waste
management authority, which agreement shall include, without limitation, procedures for the
appointment of a board of trustees of the authority to be comprised of at least the president of the
board of county commissioners of each county in the district or his the president's designee, the chief
executive officer of the municipal corporation having the largest population within the boundaries of
each county in the district or his the chief executive officer's designee, a member representing the
townships within each county in the district chosen by a majority of the boards of township trustees
within each county, the health commissioner of the health district having the largest territorial
jurisdiction within each county in the district or his the health commissioner's designee, and one
member representing the public to be appointed by the other members of the board.
The agreement forming the regional authority shall be adopted in the same manner as the
initial proposal to form the regional authority. Not later than thirty days after the adoption of the
agreement, the board of trustees appointed under it shall mail a copy of the agreement to the director
of environmental protection.
(B) Following the formation of a regional solid waste management authority under division
(A) of this section, all the duties and responsibilities imposed on or granted to a board of county
commissioners or a board of directors under this chapter shall be vested in and exercised by the
board of trustees of the regional authority. Those duties and responsibilities shall include, without
limitation, all of the following:
(1) Appointment of employees necessary to manage the affairs of the district, including,
without limitation, an executive director, and a sanitary engineer or engineers to execute the
responsibilities assigned to the county sanitary engineer under this chapter;
(2) Acquisition, construction, improvement, enlargement, replacement, maintenance, and
operation of solid waste facilities within the district;
(3) Issuance of bonds and bond anticipation notes in accordance with Chapter 133. of the
Revised Code.
(C) In addition to the duties and responsibilities identified in division (B) of this section and
division (H) of section 3734.54 of the Revised Code, the board of trustees of a regional solid waste
management authority may do any of the following:
(1) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;
(2) Maintain an office within its county or joint solid waste management district;
(3) Provide coverage for its employees under Chapters 145., 4123., and 4141. of the Revised
Code and procure and pay all or any part of the cost of group hospitalization, surgical, major
medical, and sickness and accident insurance and group life insurance for its employees;
(4) Procure insurance against loss to the regional authority by reason of damages to its
properties resulting from fire, theft, accident, or other casualties or by reason of its liability for any
damages to persons or property occurring in the construction or operation of facilities under its
jurisdiction or the conduct of its activities;

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
13
(5) Procure a policy or policies insuring members of the board of trustees against liability on
account of damages or injury to persons and property resulting from any act or omission of a
member in his the member's official capacity as a member of the board or resulting solely out of his
membership on the board;
(6) Sue or be sued;
(7) Make contracts in the exercise of the rights, powers, and duties conferred upon the
regional authority;
(8) Do all acts necessary or proper to carry out the duties and responsibilities imposed on or
granted to the board under this chapter and sections 3734.52 to 3734.575 of the Revised Code.
(D) The board of trustees of a regional solid waste management authority in a county solid
waste management district may designate the prosecuting attorney of the county to serve as the legal
advisor of the authority, and the board of trustees of an authority in a joint district may designate the
prosecuting attorney of one of the counties forming the district to serve as the legal advisor of the
authority. The designated prosecuting attorney shall provide such services to the authority as are
required or authorized to be provided to county boards under Chapter 309. of the Revised Code. The
board of trustees may pay to the county whose prosecuting attorney is serving as the authority's legal
advisor any amount agreed upon by the board of trustees and the board of county commissioners of
that county to reimburse that county for the cost properly allocable to the services of its prosecuting
attorney as the authority's legal advisor. When a prosecuting attorney is so serving and the board
considers it to be necessary or appropriate, the board, on its own initiative, may employ an attorney
or other legal counsel to advise the board regarding a particular matter in place of the prosecuting
attorney.
Instead of designating the prosecuting attorney of the county or of one of the counties
forming the district, as appropriate, to be the legal advisor of the regional authority, the board of
trustees may employ on an annual basis an attorney or other legal counsel to serve as the authority's
legal advisor. Notwithstanding the employment of an attorney or other legal counsel on an annual
basis as the authority's legal advisor, the board of trustees may require written opinions or
instructions from the prosecuting attorney of the county or, in the case of a joint district, any of the
counties forming the district in matters connected with the board's official duties, and the
prosecuting attorney shall provide the written opinion or instructions as though he the prosecuting
attorney had been designated to serve as the authority's legal advisor under this division.
(E) Within ninety days after October 29, 1993, one member representing industrial,
commercial, or institutional generators of solid wastes within the district and one member
representing the general interests of citizens who shall have no conflict of interest through affiliation
with a waste management company or with any entity that is a significant generator of solid wastes
shall be added to the board of trustees of a regional authority formed in a county district. In the case
of a regional authority formed in a joint district, one member shall be added to the board of trustees
from each county that is a member of the joint district to represent industrial, commercial, or

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
14
institutional generators of solid wastes within the county, and one member shall be added to the
board from each such county to represent the general interests of citizens who shall have no conflict
of interest through affiliation with a waste management company or with any entity that is a
significant generator of solid wastes. The members representing generators and the general interests
of citizens shall be added to the board of trustees without the necessity for amending the agreement
to form the regional authority. They shall be appointed in the same manner as the public member of
the board is required to be appointed under this section and shall serve for terms of the same length
as the other members, as provided in the agreement.
(F) As used in this chapter and in division (E) of section 3714.07 of the Revised Code,
divisions (D) to (H) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code, and sections 3734.522, 3734.571,
3734.572, 3734.573, 3734.574, and 3734.575 of the Revised Code, and as used in Chapter 133. of
the Revised Code for the purposes of this chapter, any reference to a board of county commissioners
of a county or a board of directors of a joint solid waste management district is deemed to include
the board of trustees of a regional solid waste management authority, and any reference to the
county sanitary engineer is deemed to include any sanitary engineer employed by a regional
authority.
Sec. 343.012. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Change in district composition" and "change" have the same meaning as in section
3734.521 of the Revised Code.
(2) "Deliver" has the same meaning as in division (G)(2) of section 3734.55 of the Revised
Code.
(B) The board of county commissioners of a county forming a joint solid waste management
district may initiate proceedings to withdraw from the district by adopting a resolution requesting to
withdraw. Upon adopting the resolution, the board shall deliver a copy of it to the board of directors
of the district. Upon receiving the resolution, the board of directors shall deliver written notice of the
proposed withdrawal to the boards of county commissioners of the other counties forming the
district. Within sixty days after receiving the notice, the other boards of county commissioners each
shall adopt a resolution approving or disapproving the proposed withdrawal and deliver a copy of
the resolution to the board of directors. If any of the other boards of county commissioners adopts a
resolution of disapproval, the board of directors shall declare the proposed withdrawal to be
disapproved and shall deliver written notice of the disapproval to the boards of county
commissioners of the affected counties. If all of the other boards of county commissioners adopt a
resolution approving the proposed withdrawal, the board of directors shall declare the withdrawal to
be approved and shall deliver written notice of the approval to the boards of county commissioners
of the affected counties. The board of directors shall determine whether the withdrawal has been
approved or disapproved and deliver the required written notice of the approval or disapproval to the
boards of county commissioners of the affected counties within thirty days after receiving the
resolutions of approval or disapproval from those boards. Promptly after the approval of the

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
15
withdrawal, proceedings shall be initiated in accordance with division (E) of section 3734.521 of the
Revised Code to effect the withdrawal.
A withdrawal becomes final on the first day of January following the date on which the
applicable conditions set forth in division (G)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of section 3734.521 of the Revised
Code have been met in connection with the change in district composition that involves the
withdrawal. On and after that first day of January, the withdrawing county ceases to be a part of the
joint district, its members on the board of directors shall cease to be members of the board, and its
power to levy a tax upon taxable property to support the district terminates, except that the county
shall continue to levy and collect any taxes levied for the payment of indebtedness of the district as it
was composed at the time the indebtedness was incurred. Upon the withdrawal of a county from a
joint district, the board of directors shall ascertain, apportion, and order a division of the funds on
hand, credits, and real and personal property of the district, either in money or in kind, on any
equitable basis between the district and the withdrawing county consistent with the agreement to
establish and maintain the district entered into and ratified under division (A) of section 343.01 of
the Revised Code and the prior contributions of the withdrawing county.
If the withdrawal of one or more counties would leave only one county participating in a
joint district, the board of directors shall ascertain, apportion, and order a final division of the funds
on hand, credits, and real and personal property of the district. On and after the first day of January
on which the latest withdrawal of a county from the district becomes final, the district shall be
dissolved. When a joint district is dissolved and any indebtedness remains unpaid, the boards of
county commissioners shall continue to levy and collect taxes for the payment of the indebtedness in
support of the joint district in the amounts established by the agreement at the time the indebtedness
was incurred.
For the purposes of this division, "counties forming the joint district" include only the
following:
(1) The counties that are named as members of the joint district in the solid waste
management plan or amended plan of the district approved or ordered to be implemented under
section 3734.521, 3734.55, or 3734.56 of the Revised Code in effect when the withdrawal
proceeding was initiated and that have not previously initiated proceedings under division (B) of this
section to withdraw from the joint district;
(2) Any counties named as members of the joint district in that plan or amended plan that
have initiated a withdrawal proceeding under division (B) of this section that has been declared to be
disapproved under that division;
(3) If joinder proceedings had previously been concluded under division (D) of this section
since that plan or amended plan was approved or ordered to be implemented, any county whose
joinder to the district was declared to be approved in those proceedings.
(C)(B)(1) The board of county commissioners of a county seeking to establish a new joint
district with the board of county commissioners of one or more other counties may initiate

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
16
proceedings to do so by adopting a resolution proposing the establishment of the joint district. Upon
adopting the resolution, the board shall deliver a copy of it to the boards of county commissioners of
the other counties to be included in the proposed joint district.
(2) If the board proposing the establishment of a new joint district also has initiated
proceedings to withdraw from an existing joint district under division (B) of this section 3734.522 of
the Revised Code, the board shall not adopt a resolution proposing the establishment until after the
proposed withdrawal has been declared to be approved memorandum of understanding has been
executed in accordance with that section and, upon adopting the resolution, shall deliver the board
delivers a copy of the written notice declaring the withdrawal to be approved under that division
memorandum of understanding to the other boards along with the copy of the resolution proposing
the establishment of the new district.
(3) Within sixty days after receiving the resolution proposing the establishment of the new
joint district and, if applicable, a copy of the notice of the approval of the withdrawalmemorandum
of understanding, each of the other boards shall adopt a resolution approving or disapproving the
proposed establishment and deliver a copy of it to the board of county commissioners proposing the
establishment. However, if any of the other boards also has initiated entered into withdrawal
proceedings under division (B) of this section 3734.522 of the Revised Code, and if the withdrawal
has been declared to be disapproved or has not yet been declared to be approved or disapproved
under that division, that board need not adopt a resolution concerning the proposed establishment,
but such board shall deliver to the board of county commissioners proposing the establishment a
copy of the written notice of the disapproval or, if the withdrawal has not yet been declared to be
approved or disapproved, written notice of that fact. If the withdrawal has been declared to be
approved under division (B) of this section, the board shall deliver a copy of the written notice of the
approval with the copy of its resolution approving or disapproving the proposed
establishmentexecuted memorandum of understanding entered into under that section. If any of the
other boards adopts a resolution of disapproval, or if any of the other boards initiated withdrawal
proceedings under division (B) of this section and the withdrawal either has been declared to be
disapproved under that division or has not yet been declared to be approved or disapproved under
that division when the board of county commissioners so notified the board of county
commissioners proposing the establishment, the board of county commissioners proposing the
establishment shall declare the proposed establishment to be disapproved and shall deliver written
notice of the disapproval to the other boards. If all of the other boards adopt a resolution approving
the establishment, and, if any of the other boards initiated such withdrawal proceedings, the
withdrawal already has been declared to be approved under that division when the board of county
commissioners delivered the resolution approving the establishment to the board of county
commissioners proposing the establishment, the board that initiated the proceedings shall declare the
establishment to be approved and shall deliver written notice of the approval to the other boards. The
board of county commissioners that initiated the proceedings shall determine whether the

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
17
establishment has been approved or disapproved and deliver the required written notice of the
approval or disapproval to the other boards within thirty days after receiving the resolutions of
approval or disapproval from the other boards or being otherwise notified by them in accordance
with this division.
(4) Promptly after the approval of the establishment, the boards shall enter into and ratify an
agreement to form the joint district under division (A) of section 343.01 of the Revised Code, and
proceedings shall be initiated under section 3734.521 of the Revised Code to effect the
establishment of the joint district. The establishment of the joint district becomes final when the
applicable conditions set forth in division (G)(1), (2), (3), or (4) and, if appropriate, division (H) (E)
of section 3734.521 of the Revised Code have been met in connection with the change in district
composition that involves the establishment. On the date that the establishment becomes final, the
boards of county commissioners of the counties establishing the joint district collectively constitute
the board of directors of the joint district, except that if a county with a legislative authority other
than a board of county commissioners participates in the joint district, it shall be represented on the
board of directors by three persons appointed by the legislative authority of the county.
(D)(C)(1) The board of county commissioners of a county may initiate proceedings to join
an existing joint district by adopting a resolution requesting membership in the joint district. Upon
adoption of the resolution, the board shall deliver a copy of it to the board of directors of the joint
district.
(2) If the board of county commissioners proposing the joinder also has initiated proceedings
to withdraw from an existing joint district under division (B) of this section 3734.522 of the Revised
Code, the board shall not adopt a resolution proposing the joinder until after the withdrawal has been
declared to be approved under that division memorandum of understanding has been executed in
accordance with that section and, upon adopting the resolution, such board shall deliver a copy of
the written notice declaring the withdrawal to be approved under that division memorandum of
understanding to the board of directors of the joint district along with the resolution proposing the
joinder. Upon receiving the resolution and, if applicable, a copy of the notice of the approval of the
withdrawalmemorandum of understanding, the board of directors shall deliver notice of the
proposed joinder to the boards of county commissioners of the counties forming the existing joint
district.
(3) Within sixty days after receiving the notice of the proposed joinder, each such board
shall adopt a resolution approving or disapproving the joinder and shall deliver a copy of the
resolution to the board of directors. If the board of county commissioners of any of the counties
forming the existing joint district adopts a resolution of disapproval or if any of the counties that are
members of the existing joint district had initiated a withdrawal from it under division (B) of this
section that had not yet been declared to be approved or disapproved under that division when the
board of county commissioners delivered their resolutions approving or disapproving the joinder to
the board of directors, the board of directors shall declare the proposed joinder to be disapproved

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
18
and shall deliver written notice of the disapproval to the affected boards of county commissioners. If
the board of county commissioners of each county forming the existing joint district adopts a
resolution approving the proposed joinder and, if any of the counties that are members of the
existing joint district has initiated a withdrawal from it under division (B) of this section, the
withdrawal has been declared to be approved or disapproved under that division, the board of
directors shall declare the joinder to be approved and shall deliver written notice of the approval to
the affected boards of county commissioners. The board of directors shall determine whether the
joinder has been approved or disapproved and deliver the required written notice of the approval or
disapproval to the boards of county commissioners of the affected counties within thirty days after
receiving the resolutions of approval or disapproval from the boards of county commissioners of the
counties forming the existing joint district.
(4) Promptly after the approval of the joinder, the affected boards shall enter into and ratify
an agreement under division (A) of section 343.01 of the Revised Code to join the county to the joint
district, and proceedings shall be initiated in accordance with section 3734.521 of the Revised Code
to effect the joinder. The joinder becomes final when the applicable conditions set forth in division
(G)(1), (2), (3), or (4) and, if appropriate, division (H)(E) of section 3734.521 of the Revised Code
have been met in connection with the change in district composition that involves the joinder. When
the joinder becomes final, the board of county commissioners of the joining county or three
members appointed by its legislative authority, if other than a board of county commissioners, shall
be added to the board of directors of the joint district. If one or more counties withdrew from the
existing joint district in connection with the change that involved the joinder, the members of the
board of directors of the existing joint district from the counties that withdrew shall cease to serve as
members of the board of directors on the date that the change becomes final.
(5) For the purposes of this division (C) of this section, "counties forming the existing joint
district" include only the following:
(1)(a) The counties that are named as members of the joint district in the solid waste
management plan or amended plan of the district approved or ordered to be implemented under
section 3734.521, 3734.55, or 3734.56 of the Revised Code in effect when the joinder proceeding
was initiated and that have not initiated proceedings to withdraw from the joint district under
division (B) of this section 3734.522 of the Revised Code;
(2) Any counties named as members of the joint district in that plan or amended plan that
have initiated a withdrawal under division (B) of this section that has been declared to be
disapproved under that division;
(3)(b) If joinder proceedings had previously been concluded under this division since that
plan or amended plan was approved or ordered to be implemented, any county whose joinder to the
district was declared to be approved in those proceedings.
(E)(D)(1) As used in this division:
(a) "Initiating joint district" means the joint district that initiates proceedings for the union of

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
19
the district with another joint district.
(b) "Joining joint district" means the joint district that is requested by an initiating joint
district to become one joint district in union.
(c) "Counties forming the existing joint districts" includes only the following:
(i) The counties that are named as members of one of the joint districts affected by the
proposed union in the solid waste management plan or amended plan of the appropriate district
approved or ordered to be implemented under section 3734.521, 3734.55, or 3734.56 of the Revised
Code in effect when the union proceeding was initiated and that have not initiated proceedings under
section 3734.522 of the Revised Code;
(ii) If joinder proceedings previously had been concluded under this section to join a county
to an existing joint district affected by the proposed union, any county whose joinder to the existing
joint district was declared to be approved in that proceeding.
(2) The board of directors of a joint district may initiate proceedings for the union of the
district with another joint district by adopting a resolution requesting the union.
(3) If the initiating joint district whose board of directors is requesting the union is affected
by a withdrawal proceeding initiated under division (B) of this section 3734.522 of the Revised
Code, the board of directors of the initiating joint district shall not adopt a resolution requesting the
union until after it has declared the proposed withdrawal to be approved or disapproved under
division (B) of this the memorandum of understanding has been executed in accordance with that
section. Upon adoption of the resolution, the board shall deliver a copy of it to the board of directors
of the joining joint district with which the union is proposed. Within thirty days after receiving the
resolution, the board of directors of the other joining joint district shall deliver written notice to the
initiating joint district's board of directors requesting the union as to whether the other joining joint
district is affected by a withdrawal proceeding initiated under division (B) of this section 3734.522
of the Revised Code. If the other joining joint district is so affected, its board of directors shall
deliver with the notice a copy of the resolution proposing the withdrawal and a copy of the written
notice declaring the withdrawal to be approved or disapproved under division (B) of this section or,
if the withdrawal has not yet been declared to be approved or disapproved, written notice of that
factmemorandum of understanding executed in accordance with that section. If the board of
directors of the other district declares such a withdrawal to be approved or disapproved within sixty
days after the board of directors that requested the union delivered copies of the resolution
requesting the union to the boards of county commissioners of the counties forming the existing
joint districts, the board of directors of the other district shall deliver written notice of the approval
or disapproval of the withdrawal to the board of directors that requested the union.
(4) Within thirty days after receiving from the board of directors of the other joining joint
district the written notice as to whether that district is affected by a withdrawal proceeding, the
initiating joint district's board of directors requesting the union shall deliver a copy of the resolution
requesting the union to the boards of county commissioners of the counties forming the existing

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
20
joint districts. Within sixty days after receiving the resolution, each such board of county
commissioners shall adopt a resolution approving or disapproving the union and deliver a copy of it
to the initiating joint district's board of directors that requested the union. If the board of county
commissioners of any of the counties forming the existing joint districts adopts a resolution of
disapproval or if any of the joint districts is affected by a withdrawal from it initiated under division
(B) of this section that had not yet been declared to be approved or disapproved under that division
when the board of county commissioners proposing the withdrawal delivered its resolution
approving or disapproving the proposed union to the board of directors, the board of directors shall
declare the union to be disapproved and shall deliver written notice of the disapproval to the board
of county commissioners of each of the affected counties. If the boards of county commissioners of
all of the counties forming the existing joint districts adopt resolutions approving the proposed union
and, if any of the joint districts is affected by a withdrawal proceeding initiated under division (B) of
this section, the withdrawal had already been declared to be approved or disapproved under that
division when the board of county commissioners of the counties forming the existing joint districts
delivered their resolutions approving the proposed union to the board of directors, the board of
directors shall declare the union to be approved and shall deliver written notice of that fact to the
affected boards of county commissioners. The board of directors shall determine whether the union
has been approved or disapproved and deliver the required written notices of the approval or
disapproval to the boards of county commissioners of the counties forming the existing joint districts
within thirty days after receiving the resolutions of approval or disapproval from those boards of
county commissioners.
(5) Promptly after the approval of the union, the boards of county commissioners of the
affected counties shall enter into and ratify an agreement under division (A) of section 343.01 of the
Revised Code to unite the districts, and proceedings shall be initiated in accordance with section
3734.521 of the Revised Code to effect the union. The union becomes final when the applicable
conditions set forth in division (G)(1), (2), (3), or (4) and, if appropriate, division (H)(E) of section
3734.521 of the Revised Code have been met in connection with the change in district composition
that involves the union. On the date that the union becomes final, the boards of directors of the
former joint districts collectively constitute the board of directors of the united district, except that if
one or more counties were joined to any of the existing joint districts in connection with the change
in district composition that involved the union, the board of county commissioners or three members
appointed by its legislative authority, if other than a board of county commissioners, shall be added
to the board of directors of the united district, and except that if one or more counties withdrew from
any of the existing joint districts in connection with the change in district composition that involved
the union, the board of directors shall not include members from the counties that withdrew from the
former joint districts.
For the purposes of this division, "counties forming the existing joint districts" includes only
the following:

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
21
(1) The counties that are named as members of one of the joint districts affected by the
proposed union in the solid waste management plan or amended plan of the appropriate district
approved or ordered to be implemented under section 3734.521, 3734.55, or 3734.56 of the Revised
Code in effect when the union proceeding was initiated and that have not initiated proceedings under
division (B) of this section to withdraw from the joint districts of which they were members on that
date;
(2) Any county named as a member of a joint district affected by the proposed union in any
such plan or amended plan that has initiated a withdrawal under division (B) of this section that has
been declared to be disapproved under that division;
(3) If joinder proceedings previously had been concluded under division (D) of this section
to join a county to an existing joint district affected by the proposed union, any county whose joinder
to the existing joint district was declared to be approved in that proceeding.
Sec. 343.022. (A) The board of county commissioners of a county solid waste management
district or the board of directors of a joint solid waste management district may enter into a contract
or agreement with the owner or operator of a solid waste facility, or with persons collecting or
transporting solid wastes, to establish and collect on behalf of the district generation or disposal fees
to be used by the district for the purposes set forth in divisions (G)(1) to (10)division (G) of section
3734.57 of the Revised Code or to provide other remuneration or services to or on behalf of the
district or its residents.
(B) The authority provided by division (A) of this section is cumulative and concurrent with
the authority of the board of county commissioners or directors to enter into contracts or agreements
under other sections of this chapter. The existence or exercise of one such authority does not prevent
the exercise of the other.
(C) The authority provided by division (A) of this section pertaining to disposal or
generation fees is cumulative and concurrent with the authority of the board of county
commissioners or directors to levy disposal or generation fees under section 3734.57, 3734.571,
3734.572, 3734.573, or 3734.574 of the Revised Code. The exercise of the authority provided in any
of those sections does not prevent the exercise of the authority provided by division (A) of this
section, and the authority provided by division (A) of this section does not prevent the exercise of
the authority provided in any of those sections.
Sec. 343.08. (A) The board of county commissioners of a county solid waste management
district and the board of directors of a joint solid waste management district may fix reasonable rates
or charges to be paid by every person, municipal corporation, township, or other political
subdivision that owns premises to which solid waste collection, storage, transfer, disposal, recycling,
processing, or resource recovery service is provided by the district and may change the rates or
charges whenever it considers it advisable. Charges for collection, storage, transfer, disposal,
recycling, processing, or resource recovery service shall be made only against lots or parcels that are
improved, or in the process of being improved, with at least one permanent, portable, or temporary

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
22
building. The rates or charges may be collected by either of the following means:
(1) Periodic billings made by the district directly or in conjunction with billings for public
utility rates or charges by a county water district established under section 6103.02 of the Revised
Code, a county sewer district established under section 6117.02 of the Revised Code, or a municipal
corporation or other political subdivision authorized by law to provide public utility service. When
any such charges that are so billed are not paid, the board shall certify them to the county auditor of
the county where the lots or parcels are located, who shall place them upon the real property
duplicate against the property served by the collection, storage, transfer, disposal, recycling,
processing, or resource recovery service. The charges shall be a lien on the property from the date
they are placed upon the real property duplicate by the auditor and shall be collected in the same
manner as other taxes.
(2) Certifying the rates or charges to the county auditor of the county where the lots or
parcels are located, who shall place them on the real property duplicate against the lots or parcels.
The rates or charges are a lien on the property from the date they are placed upon the real property
duplicate by the auditor and shall be collected in the same manner as other taxes.
The county or joint district need not fix a rate or charge against property if the district does
not operate a collection system.
Where a county or joint district owns or operates a solid waste facility, either without a
collection system or in conjunction therewith, the board of county commissioners or board of
directors may fix reasonable rates or charges for the use of the facility by persons, municipal
corporations, townships, and other political subdivisions, may contract with any public authority or
person for the collection of solid wastes in any part of any district for collection, storage, disposal,
transfer, recycling, processing, or resource recovery in any solid waste facility, or may lease the
facility to any public authority or person. The cost of collection, storage, transfer, disposal,
recycling, processing, or resource recovery under such contracts may be paid by rates or charges
fixed and collected under this section or by rates and charges fixed under those contracts and
collected by the contractors.
All moneys collected by or on behalf of a county or joint district as rates or charges for solid
waste collection, storage, transfer, disposal, recycling, processing, or resource recovery service in
any district shall be paid to the county treasurer in a county district or to the county treasurer or other
official designated by the board of directors in a joint district and kept in a separate and distinct fund
to the credit of the district. The fund shall be used for the payment of the cost of the management,
maintenance, and operation of the solid waste collection or other solid waste facilities of the district
and, if applicable, the payment of the cost of collecting the rates or charges of the district pursuant to
division (A)(1) or (2) of this section. Prior to the approval of the district's initial solid waste
management plan under section 3734.55 of the Revised Code or the issuance of an order under that
section requiring the district to implement an initial plan prepared by the director, as appropriate, the
fund also may be used for the purposes of division (G)(1) or (3) of section 3734.57 of the Revised

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
23
Code. On and after the approval of the district's initial plan under section 3734.521 or 3734.55 of the
Revised Code or the issuance of an order under either of those sections, as appropriate, requiring the
district to implement an initial plan prepared by the director, the fund also may be used for all of the
purposes of divisions (G)(1) to (10)specified in division (G) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code.
Those uses may include, in accordance with a cost allocation plan adopted under division (B) of this
section, the payment of all allowable direct and indirect costs of the district, the sanitary engineer or
sanitary engineering department, or a federal or state grant program, incurred for the purposes of this
chapter and sections 3734.52 to 3734.572 of the Revised Code. Any surplus remaining after those
uses of the fund may be used for the enlargement, modification, or replacement of such facilities and
for the payment of the interest and principal on bonds and bond anticipation notes issued pursuant to
section 343.07 of the Revised Code. In no case shall money so collected be expended otherwise than
for the use and benefit of the district.
A board of county commissioners or directors, instead of operating and maintaining solid
waste collection or other solid waste facilities of the district with county or joint district personnel,
may enter into a contract with a municipal corporation having territory within the district pursuant to
which the operation and maintenance of the facilities will be performed by the municipal
corporation.
The products of any solid waste collection or other solid waste facility owned under this
chapter shall be sold through competitive bidding in accordance with section 307.12 of the Revised
Code, except when a board of county commissioners or directors determines by resolution that it is
in the public interest to sell those products in a commercially reasonable manner without competitive
bidding.
(B) A board of county commissioners or directors may adopt a cost allocation plan that
identifies, accumulates, and distributes allowable direct and indirect costs that may be paid from the
fund of the district created in division (A) of this section and prescribes methods for allocating those
costs. The plan shall authorize payment from the fund for only those costs incurred by the district,
the sanitary engineer or sanitary engineering department, or a federal or state grant program, and
those costs incurred by the general and other funds of the county for a common or joint purpose, that
are necessary and reasonable for the proper and efficient administration of the district under this
chapter and sections 3734.52 to 3734.572 of the Revised Code. The plan shall not authorize payment
from the fund of any general government expense required to carry out the overall governmental
responsibilities of a county. The plan shall conform to United States office of management and
budget Circular A-87 "Cost Principles for State and Local Governments," published January 15,
1983.
(C) A board of county commissioners or directors shall fix rates or charges, or enter into
contracts fixing the rates or charges to be collected by the contractor, for solid waste collection,
storage, transfer, disposal, recycling, processing, or resource recovery services at a public meeting
held in accordance with section 121.22 of the Revised Code. In addition to fulfilling the

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
24
requirements of section 121.22 of the Revised Code, the board, before fixing or changing rates or
charges for solid waste collection, storage, transfer, disposal, recycling, processing, or resource
recovery services, or before entering into a contract that fixes rates or charges to be collected by the
contractor providing the services, shall hold at least three public hearings on the proposed rates,
charges, or contract. Prior to the first public hearing, the board shall publish notice of the public
hearings as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code or once a week for three consecutive weeks
in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties that would be affected by the
proposed rates, charges, or contract. The notice shall include a listing of the proposed rates or
charges to be fixed and collected by the board or fixed pursuant to the contract and collected by the
contractor, and the dates, time, and place of each of the three hearings thereon. The board shall hear
any person who wishes to testify on the proposed rates, charges, or contract.
Sec. 3714.07. (A)(1) For the purpose of assisting boards of health and the environmental
protection agency in administering and enforcing this chapter and rules adopted under it, there is
hereby levied a fee of thirty cents per cubic yard or sixty cents per ton, as applicable, on both of the
following:
(a) The disposal of construction and demolition debris at a construction and demolition
debris facility that is licensed under this chapter or at a solid waste facility that is licensed under
Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code;
(b) The disposal of asbestos or asbestos-containing materials or products at a construction
and demolition debris facility that is licensed under this chapter or at a solid waste facility that is
licensed under Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code.
(2) The owner or operator of a construction and demolition debris facility or a solid waste
facility shall determine if cubic yards or tons will be used as the unit of measurement. If basing the
fee on cubic yards, the owner or operator shall utilize either the maximum cubic yard capacity of the
container, or the hauling volume of the vehicle, that transports the construction and demolition
debris to the facility or the cubic yards actually logged for disposal by the owner or operator in
accordance with rules adopted under section 3714.02 of the Revised Code. If basing the fee on
tonnage, the owner or operator shall use certified scales to determine the tonnage of construction and
demolition debris that is disposed of.
(3) The owner or operator of a construction and demolition debris facility or a solid waste
facility shall calculate the amount of money generated from the fee levied under division (A)(1) of
this section and shall hold that amount as a trustee for the health district having jurisdiction over the
facility, if that district is on the approved list under section 3714.09 of the Revised Code, or for the
state. The owner or operator shall prepare and file with the appropriate board of health or the
director of environmental protection monthly returns indicating the total volume or weight, as
applicable, of construction and demolition debris and asbestos or asbestos-containing materials or
products disposed of at the facility and the total amount of money generated during that month from
the fee levied under division (A)(1) of this section on the disposal of construction and demolition

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
25
debris and asbestos or asbestos-containing materials or products. Not later than thirty days after the
last day of the month to which the return applies, the owner or operator shall mail to the board of
health or the director the return for that month together with the amount of money calculated under
division (A)(3) of this section on the disposal of construction and demolition debris and asbestos or
asbestos-containing materials or products during that month or may submit the return and money
electronically in a manner approved by the director. The owner or operator may request, in writing,
an extension of not more than thirty days after the last day of the month to which the return applies.
A request for extension may be denied. If the owner or operator submits the money late, the owner
or operator shall pay a penalty of ten per cent of the amount of the money due for each month that it
is late.
(4) Of the money that is submitted by a construction and demolition debris facility or a solid
waste facility on a per cubic yard or per ton basis under this section, a board of health shall transmit
three cents per cubic yard or six cents per ton, as applicable, to the director not later than forty-five
days after the receipt of the money. The money retained by a board of health under this section shall
be paid into a special fund, which is hereby created in each health district, and used solely for the
following purposes:
(a) To administer and enforce this chapter and Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code and rules
adopted under them;
(b) To abate abandoned accumulations of construction and demolition debris as provided in
section 3714.074 of the Revised Code;
(c) To mitigate any impacts to public health, safety, and welfare of any construction and
demolition debris facility and solid waste disposal or transfer facility within the health district,
including ensuring appropriate inspection of any such facility to prevent any negative public health,
safety, and welfare impact.
The director shall transmit all money received under this section to the treasurer of state to
be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the waste management fund created in section
3734.061 of the Revised Code.
(B) The board of health of a health district or the director may enter into an agreement with
the owner or operator of a construction and demolition debris facility or a solid waste facility for the
quarterly payment of money generated from the disposal fee as calculated in division (A)(3) of this
section. The board of health shall notify the director of any such agreement. Not later than forty-five
days after receipt of the quarterly payment, the board of health shall transmit the amount established
in division (A)(4) of this section to the director. The money retained by the board of health shall be
deposited in the special fund of the district as required under that division. Upon receipt of the
money from a board of health, the director shall transmit the money to the treasurer of state to be
credited to the waste management fund.
(C) If a construction and demolition debris facility or a solid waste facility is located within
the territorial boundaries of a municipal corporation or the unincorporated area of a township, the

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
26
municipal corporation or township may appropriate up to four cents per cubic yard or up to eight
cents per ton of the disposal fee required to be paid by the facility under division (A)(1) of this
section for the same purposes that a municipal corporation or township may levy a fee under
division (C) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code.
The legislative authority of the municipal corporation or township may appropriate the
money from the fee by enacting an ordinance or adopting a resolution establishing the amount of the
fee to be appropriated. Upon doing so, the legislative authority shall mail a certified copy of the
ordinance or resolution to the board of health of the health district in which the construction and
demolition debris facility or the solid waste facility is located or, if the facility is located in a health
district that is not on the approved list under section 3714.09 of the Revised Code, to the director.
Upon receipt of the copy of the ordinance or resolution and not later than forty-five days after
receipt of money generated from the fee, the board or the director, as applicable, shall transmit to the
treasurer or other appropriate officer of the municipal corporation or clerk of the township that
portion of the money generated from the disposal fee by the owner or operator of the facility that is
required by the ordinance or resolution to be paid to that municipal corporation or township.
Money received by the treasurer or other appropriate officer of a municipal corporation
under this division shall be paid into the general fund of the municipal corporation. Money received
by the clerk of a township under this division shall be paid into the general fund of the township.
The treasurer or other officer of the municipal corporation or the clerk of the township, as
appropriate, shall maintain separate records of the money received under this division.
The legislative authority of a municipal corporation or township may cease appropriating
money under this division by repealing the ordinance or resolution that was enacted or adopted
under this division.
The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code
establishing requirements for prorating the amount of the fee that may be appropriated under this
division by a municipal corporation or township in which only a portion of a construction and
demolition debris facility is located within the territorial boundaries of the municipal corporation or
township.
(D) The board of county commissioners of a county in which a construction and demolition
debris facility or a solid waste facility is located may appropriate up to three cents per cubic yard or
up to six cents per ton of the disposal fee required to be paid by the facility under division (A)(1) of
this section for the same purposes that a solid waste management district may levy a fee under
division (B) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code.
The board of county commissioners may appropriate the money from the fee by adopting a
resolution establishing the amount of the fee to be appropriated. Upon doing so, the board of county
commissioners shall mail a certified copy of the resolution to the board of health of the health
district in which the construction and demolition debris facility or the solid waste facility is located
or, if the facility is located in a health district that is not on the approved list under section 3714.09

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
27
of the Revised Code, to the director. Upon receipt of the copy of the resolution and not later than
forty-five days after receipt of money generated from the fee, the board of health or the director, as
applicable, shall transmit to the treasurer of the county that portion of the money generated from the
disposal fee by the owner or operator of the facility that is required by the resolution to be paid to
that county.
Money received by a county treasurer under this division shall be paid into the general fund
of the county. The county treasurer shall maintain separate records of the money received under this
division.
A board of county commissioners may cease appropriating money under this division by
repealing the resolution that was adopted under this division.
(E)(1) This section does not apply to the disposal of construction and demolition debris at a
solid waste facility that is licensed under Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code if there is no
construction and demolition debris facility licensed under this chapter within thirty-five miles of the
solid waste facility as determined by a facility's property boundaries.
(2) This section does not apply to the disposal of construction and demolition debris at a
solid waste facility that is licensed under Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code if the owner or operator
of the facility chooses to collect fees on the disposal of the construction and demolition debris and
asbestos or asbestos-containing materials or products that are identical to the fees that are collected
under Chapters 343. and 3734. of the Revised Code on the disposal of solid wastes at that facility.
(3)(E)(1) Beginning three years after the effective date of this amendment, the solid waste
management policy committee of a county or joint solid waste management district may levy fees
upon the following activities:
(a) The disposal of construction and demolition debris and asbestos or asbestos-containing
materials or products generated within the jurisdiction of the district at construction and demolition
debris facilities located in an authorized county and within the district's jurisdiction and at solid
waste disposal facilities located in an authorized county and within the district's jurisdiction;
(b) The disposal of construction and demolition debris and asbestos or asbestos-containing
materials or products generated outside of the jurisdiction of the district, but inside this state, at
construction and demolition debris facilities located in an authorized county and within the district's
jurisdiction and at solid waste disposal facilities located in an authorized county and within the
district's jurisdiction;
(c) The disposal of construction and demolition debris and asbestos or asbestos-containing
materials or products generated outside the boundaries of this state at construction and demolition
debris facilities located in an authorized county and within the district's jurisdiction and at solid
waste disposal facilities located in an authorized county and within the jurisdiction of the district.
The fee levied under division (E)(1)(a) of this section shall be not less than one dollar per ton
nor more than two dollars per ton, the fee levied under division (E)(1)(b) of this section shall be not
less than two dollars per ton nor more than four dollars per ton, and the fee levied under division (E)

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
28
(1)(c) of this section shall be not more than the fee levied under division (E)(1)(a) of this section.
(2) The district shall establish, amend, or repeal the schedule of fees levied pursuant to this
division in the same manner that applies to fees levied under division (B) of section 3734.57 of the
Revised Code. All procedural requirements governing the administration and collection of solid
waste fees levied under divisions (A) and (B) of that section apply to the administration and
collection of the construction and demolition debris fees levied under this division and collected by
an owner or operator of a solid waste facility or construction and demolition debris facility. Such
procedural requirements include requirements governing fee collection and accounting, filing of
returns, extensions on returns, discounts, refunds or credits, the conversion rate for fee collection in
cubic yards, notices, and district composition changes. Any notices required to be made pursuant to
those procedural requirements to the owner or operator of a solid waste facility also shall be
provided to the owner or operator of a construction and demolition debris facility for purposes of
this division, when applicable.
(3)(a) The solid waste management district may forward seventy-five per cent of the money
received from an owner or operator of a facility under this division to the health district in which the
facility is located, which shall deposit it into the special fund established under division (A)(4) of
this section to be used solely for the purposes specified in that division. If a solid waste management
district does not forward money received under this division to the health district in which the
facility is located, the solid waste management district shall retain that money and use it for the
purposes specified in division (G) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code.
(b) The solid waste management district shall forward twenty-five per cent of the money
received from an owner or operator of a facility under this division to the environmental protection
agency, which shall deposit half of the money into the environmental protection fund created in
section 3745.015 of the Revised Code and half of the money into the waste management fund
created in section 3734.061 of the Revised Code.
(c) A solid waste management district shall not levy fees under this division with respect to a
construction and demolition debris facility or solid waste facility that is located in a health district
that is not on the approved list under section 3714.09 of the Revised Code.
As used in this division, "authorized county" means a county with a population between
fifty-three thousand and fifty-eight thousand, according to the most recent decennial census.
(F) This section does not apply to the disposal of source separated materials that are
exclusively composed of reinforced or nonreinforced concrete, asphalt, clay tile, building or paving
brick, or building or paving stone at a construction and demolition debris facility that is licensed
under this chapter when either of the following applies:
(a)(1) The materials are placed within the limits of construction and demolition debris
placement at the facility as specified in the license issued to the facility under section 3714.06 of the
Revised Code, are not placed within the unloading zone of the facility, and are used as a fire
prevention measure in accordance with rules adopted by the director under section 3714.02 of the

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
29
Revised Code.
(b)(2) The materials are not placed within the unloading zone of the facility or within the
limits of construction and demolition debris placement at the facility as specified in the license
issued to the facility under section 3714.06 of the Revised Code, but are used as fill material, either
alone or in conjunction with clean soil, sand, gravel, or other clean aggregates, in legitimate fill
operations for construction purposes at the facility or to bring the facility up to a consistent grade.
Sec. 3714.073. (A) In addition to the fee levied under division (A)(1) of section 3714.07 of
the Revised Code, beginning July 1, 2005, there is hereby levied on the disposal of construction and
demolition debris at a construction and demolition debris facility that is licensed under this chapter
or at a solid waste facility that is licensed under Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code and on the
disposal of asbestos or asbestos-containing materials or products at a construction and demolition
debris facility that is licensed under this chapter or at a solid waste facility that is licensed under
Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code the following fees:
(1) A fee of twelve and one-half cents per cubic yard or twenty-five cents per ton, as
applicable, the proceeds of which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the soil and
water conservation district assistance fund created in section 940.15 of the Revised Code;
(2) A fee of thirty-five cents per cubic yard or seventy cents per ton, as applicable, the
proceeds of which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the recycling and litter
prevention fund created in section 3736.03 of the Revised Code;
(3) A fee of two and one-half cents per cubic yard or five cents per ton, as applicable, the
proceeds of which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the waste management fund
created in section 3734.061 of the Revised Code.
(B) The owner or operator of a construction and demolition debris facility or a solid waste
facility, as a trustee of the state, shall calculate the amount of money generated from the fees levied
under this section and remit the money from the fees in the manner that is established in divisions
(A)(2) and (3) of section 3714.07 of the Revised Code for the fee that is levied under division (A)(1)
of that section and may enter into an agreement for the quarterly payment of money generated from
the fees in the manner established in division (B) of that section for the quarterly payment of money
generated from the fee that is levied under division (A)(1) of that section.
(C) The amount of money that is calculated by the owner or operator of a construction and
demolition debris facility or a solid waste facility and remitted to a board of health or the director of
environmental protection, as applicable, pursuant to this section shall be transmitted by the board or
director to the treasurer of state not later than forty-five days after the receipt of the money to be
credited to the soil and water conservation district assistance fund or the recycling and litter
prevention fund, as applicable.
(D) This section does not apply to the disposal of construction and demolition debris at a
solid waste facility that is licensed under Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code if the owner or operator
of the facility chooses to collect fees on the disposal of the construction and demolition debris and

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
30
asbestos or asbestos-containing materials or products that are identical to the fees that are collected
under Chapters 343. and 3734. of the Revised Code on the disposal of solid wastes at that facility.
(E) This section does not apply to the disposal of source separated materials that are
exclusively composed of reinforced or nonreinforced concrete, asphalt, clay tile, building or paving
brick, or building or paving stone at a construction and demolition debris facility that is licensed
under this chapter when either of the following applies:
(1) The materials are placed within the limits of construction and demolition debris
placement at the facility as specified in the license issued to the facility under section 3714.06 of the
Revised Code, are not placed within the unloading zone of the facility, and are used as a fire
prevention measure in accordance with rules adopted by the director under section 3714.02 of the
Revised Code.
(2) The materials are not placed within the unloading zone of the facility or within the limits
of construction and demolition debris placement at the facility as specified in the license issued to
the facility under section 3714.06 of the Revised Code, but are used as fill material, either alone or
in conjunction with clean soil, sand, gravel, or other clean aggregates, in legitimate fill operations
for construction purposes at the facility or to bring the facility up to a consistent grade.
Sec. 3734.521. (A) As used in this section and sections 3734.531 and 3734.57 of the Revised
Code, "change in district composition" or "change" includes the withdrawal of a county from a joint
solid waste management district, the establishment of a new county or joint district, the joinder of a
county to an existing joint district, the union of two or more joint districts, or any combination
thereof.
(B) In addition to the requirements under Chapter 343. of the Revised Code, the
requirements of this section govern a change in district composition when any of the districts
involved are operating under a solid waste management plan or amended plan approved or ordered
to be implemented under this section or section 3734.55 or 3734.56 of the Revised Code.
(C) For purposes of preparing the initial and amended solid waste management plans for the
county and joint districts resulting from any proposed change in district composition, the solid waste
management policy committee for the proposed resulting districts shall consist of the members
prescribed in division (B) of section 3734.54 of the Revised Code from each county within the
proposed district and shall include an additional public member only when one is required to be
appointed under division (C) of section 3734.54 of the Revised Code.
(D) In the case of a proposed establishment of a new joint district, joinder of a county to an
existing joint district, or union of existing joint districts that only involves existing county or joint
districts that are operating under solid waste management plans or amended plans approved under
this section or section 3734.55 or 3734.56 of the Revised Code and that does not involve the
withdrawal of a county from an existing joint district, the solid waste management policy committee
of the proposed joint district resulting from the change shall do all of the following:
(1) Prepare a draft initial or amended solid waste management plan for the proposed joint

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
31
district that complies with divisions (A), (B), (D), and (E)(1) of section 3734.53 of the Revised
Code;
(2) Upon completion of the draft initial or amended plan for the proposed joint district,
proceed to adopt and obtain approval of it in accordance with divisions (A), (B), and (C)(1) to (3) of
section 3734.55 of the Revised Code;
(3) Submit the initial or amended plan for the proposed joint district to the director of
environmental protection for approval not earlier than one hundred eighty days and not later than
ninety days before the date that one of the existing districts involved in the proposed change is
required to submit an amended plan under section 3734.56 of the Revised Code.
If any such proposed joint district fails to submit its plan or amended plan, as appropriate, to
the director on or before the date required under division (D)(3) of this section, the proposed change
shall not occur, and the director shall proceed in accordance with division (D) of section 3734.55 of
the Revised Code to prepare an amended plan for each of the existing districts and order the
implementation of the amended plans. If the proposed joint district fails to obtain approval of its
initial or amended plan, as appropriate, within eighteen months after the date for submission of its
initial or amended plan required under division (D)(3) of this section, the director shall proceed in
accordance with division (D) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code to prepare a plan or amended
plan, as appropriate, for the proposed joint district and to order the implementation of the plan or
amended plan.
(E) In the case of a proposed change in district composition that involves an existing district
that is operating under a solid waste management plan or amended plan prepared and ordered to be
implemented by the director under this section or section 3734.55 or 3734.56 of the Revised Code or
that involves the withdrawal of a county from an existing joint district, the solid waste management
policy committee of each of the districts resulting from the proposed change, not later than twenty
months before one of the existing districts is required to submit an amended solid waste
management plan under section 3734.56 of the Revised Code or twenty months before the triennial
anniversary of the issuance of the order under division (D) or (F)(1) or (2) of this section or division
(D) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code requiring one of the districts involved to implement a
plan prepared and ordered to be implemented under any of those divisions, shall submit to the
director a preliminary demonstration of the availability of or access to solid waste management
facility capacity under division (E)(1) or (2) of this section, as appropriate. The preliminary
demonstrations of each of the proposed districts shall be submitted to the director at the same time.
As used in divisions (E) and (F) of this section, "preliminary demonstration of capacity"
means the certification and demonstration required to be submitted under division (E)(1) of this
section or the statement and financial feasibility study required to be submitted under division (E)(2)
of this section, as appropriate.
(1) If a proposed district has located within its boundaries one or more solid waste facilities
that have sufficient remaining capacity to dispose of all the solid waste generated within its

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
32
boundaries during the subsequent ten-year period, or if the county or counties proposing to form the
district have entered into one or more firm contracts or agreements that in the aggregate provide for
the disposal of all the solid wastes generated within the proposed district during the subsequent ten-
year period at facilities located outside the district or this state, the solid waste management policy
committee of the proposed district shall submit to the director a certification and demonstration by
the committee of the availability of or access to sufficient solid waste management facility capacity
to provide for the disposal of all the solid wastes generated within the proposed district during that
ten-year period.
The director shall approve or disapprove a preliminary demonstration of capacity within
sixty days after receiving it. If the director finds that the policy committee has made the
demonstration required by division (E)(1) of this section, he shall approve the preliminary
demonstration. Otherwise, the director shall disapprove the preliminary demonstration.
(2) If a proposed district does not have sufficient solid waste management facility capacity
within its boundaries or access to sufficient capacity by contract or agreement to make the
demonstration required by division (E)(1) of this section, the solid waste management policy
committee of the proposed district shall submit to the director a statement as to how the proposed
district will provide for sufficient solid waste management facility capacity to dispose of all solid
wastes generated within its boundaries during the subsequent ten-year period. The statement shall be
accompanied by a study of the financial feasibility of the measures proposed in the statement. The
statement and financial feasibility study shall contain an inventory of all existing solid waste
disposal, transfer, and resource recovery facilities and recycling activities within the proposed
district and estimates of the remaining capacity available at each such facility; estimates of the
amounts of solid wastes that will be generated within the proposed district during each year of the
subsequent ten-year period; an identification of the additional solid waste management facilities and
capacity that the proposed district intends to provide to dispose of the estimated amounts of solid
wastes; a schedule for implementation of the measures proposed in the statement; if appropriate,
estimates of the capital and operating costs of the additional facilities that the district intends to
provide and of the rates to be charged to meet those costs; and, if appropriate, rates to be charged to
meet the costs of capacity that the district intends to provide by contract or agreement.
The director shall approve or disapprove a statement and financial feasibility study within
sixty days after receiving them. The director shall approve a statement and financial feasibility study
only if they demonstrate a technically feasible and economically reasonable means of providing for
the environmentally sound management of solid wastes generated in the district during the
subsequent ten-year period. Otherwise, the director shall disapprove the statement and financial
feasibility study.
(3) Upon approving or disapproving a preliminary demonstration of capacity under division
(E)(1) or (2) of this section, the director shall provide written notice of his decision to the solid waste
management policy committee that submitted it. If the director disapproves the preliminary

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
33
demonstration of any of the proposed districts, the change in district composition shall not occur.
The solid waste management policy committee of each of the existing districts operating under a
solid waste management plan approved under this section or section 3734.55 of the Revised Code or
an amended plan approved under this section or section 3734.56 of the Revised Code then shall
proceed to adopt and obtain approval of an amended plan in accordance with division (A) of section
3734.56 of the Revised Code. If any of the existing districts is operating under a plan or an amended
plan ordered to be implemented under this section or section 3734.55 or 3734.56 of the Revised
Code, the director then shall proceed in accordance with division (B) of section 3734.56 of the
Revised Code to prepare an amended plan for each such district and order the implementation of the
amended plan. Division (E)(3) of this section does not preclude an existing district that is operating
under a plan or amended plan prepared and ordered to be implemented by the director from
proceeding under division (C) of section 3734.56 of the Revised Code to prepare and obtain
approval of a plan to replace the initial or amended plan prepared by the director.
(4) If the director approves the preliminary demonstration of each of the proposed districts
resulting from the change in district composition under division (E)(1) or (2) of this section, the
solid waste management policy committee of each of the proposed districts shall begin preparing a
draft initial solid waste management plan for the district, and the committee of the remaining joint
district, if any, shall begin preparing a draft amended plan for the joint district. The initial or
amended plan and certification of capacity shall comply with divisions (A), (B), (D), and (E)(1) of
section 3734.53 of the Revised Code. Upon completion of the draft initial or amended plan for the
proposed district, the committee shall proceed to adopt and obtain approval of it in accordance with
divisions (A), (B), and (C)(1) to (3) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code. The initial plans of the
proposed districts and the amended plan of the remaining joint district, if any, shall be submitted to
the director at the same time and shall be submitted not later than twenty months after the proposed
districts submitted their preliminary demonstrations of capacity under division (E)(1) or (2) of this
section. If any of the proposed districts fails to submit its plan or amended plan to the director on or
before the required date, the proposed change shall not occur, and the director then shall proceed in
accordance with division (D) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code to prepare an amended plan for
each of the existing districts and to order the implementation of the amended plans.
(F) If any of the proposed districts resulting from a change in district composition, or the
remaining joint district, if any, that is required to submit a preliminary demonstration of capacity
under division (E)(1) or (2) of this section fails to obtain approval of its plan or amended plan within
thirty-eight months after the submission of its preliminary demonstration of capacity, the director
shall determine what actions are necessary to ensure that each county involved in the proposed
change will be included in a district that either will have within its boundaries sufficient solid waste
management facility capacity to provide for the disposal of all of the solid wastes generated within
its boundaries during the subsequent ten-year period or will have access to sufficient capacity at
facilities located outside the district or this state by contract or agreement to dispose of all of the

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
34
solid wastes generated within the district during that ten-year period. Based upon that determination,
the director shall do either of the following, as appropriate:
(1) If the director determines that the solid waste management needs of each of the counties
involved can be met if the proposed change were to occur, he shall prepare an initial or amended
plan that complies with divisions (A) and (D) of section 3734.53 of the Revised Code for each of the
proposed or existing districts that failed to obtain approval of its plan or amended plan within thirty-
eight months after the districts were required to submit their preliminary demonstrations of capacity
under division (E)(1) or (2) of this section. None of the plans or amended plans prepared by the
director shall contain any of the provisions required or authorized to be included in plans submitted
by districts under division (B), (C), or (E) of section 3734.53 of the Revised Code. Upon completion
of each such plan or amended plan, the director shall issue an order in accordance with Chapter
3745. of the Revised Code directing the board of county commissioners or directors of the district
for which the plan or amended plan was prepared to implement it in compliance with the
implementation schedule contained in it.
(2) If the director determines that the solid waste management needs of each of the counties
involved cannot be met if the proposed change in district composition were to occur, he shall make a
determination as to how county or joint districts should be formed from among those counties to
ensure that each will be included in a district that either will have within its boundaries sufficient
solid waste management facility capacity to provide for the disposal of all the solid wastes generated
within the district during the subsequent ten-year period or will have access to sufficient capacity at
facilities located outside the district or this state by contract or agreement to dispose of all the solid
wastes generated within the district during that ten-year period. After making his determination, the
director shall prepare an initial or amended solid waste management plan for each of them. If the
director determines that any existing district involved in the proposed change should be retained
without a modification in its composition, the director shall prepare an amended plan for the district.
The director shall prepare an initial or amended plan for each district whose composition would be
changed under his determination. Each such plan or amended plan shall comply with divisions (A)
and (D) of section 3734.53 of the Revised Code. None of the plans or amended plans shall contain
any of the provisions required or authorized to be included in plans under division (B), (C), or (E) of
that section.
If a plan prepared under this division provides for the establishment of a joint district by two
or more counties that had each previously formed a county district, the director, in accordance with
Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code, shall issue an order to the board of county commissioners of
each of the counties directing them to enter into an agreement to form a joint district under division
(A) of section 343.01 of the Revised Code within thirty days after the issuance of the order. If a plan
or amended plan prepared by the director provides for the withdrawal of one or more counties from
an existing joint district, the establishment of a new joint district, the joinder of one or more counties
to an existing joint district, or the union of two or more existing joint districts, the director, in

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
35
accordance with Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code, shall issue appropriate orders to the board of
county commissioners of each county or existing county district and to the board of directors of each
joint district that will be affected by the plan directing the board of county commissioners or
directors, within thirty days after the issuance of the order, to adopt the appropriate resolutions and
enter into any necessary agreements under division (B) of section 343.01 of the Revised Code to
effect the changes provided for in the plan. The requirements and procedures for approval of the
withdrawal from, establishment of, joinder to, or union of districts under section 343.012 of the
Revised Code do not apply to changes ordered under division (F)(2) of this section. The other
provisions of that section do apply to changes ordered under division (F)(2) of this section.
Any order issued by the director under division (F)(2) of this section also shall require the
district to be formed pursuant to the order to implement the plan or amended plan prepared by the
director in compliance with the implementation schedule contained in the plan.
(G) No proposed change in district composition shall become final until one of the following
has occurred:
(1) The director has approved the solid waste management plan of each newly formed
district under section 3734.55 of the Revised Code and the amended plan of the remaining joint
district, if any, under section 3734.56 of the Revised Code;
(2) In the case of a joint district subject to division (D) of this section that failed to obtain
approval of its plan or amended plan on or before the date required under that division, the director
has prepared a plan or amended plan for the district and has issued an order to the district directing it
to implement the plan or amended plan prepared by the director;
(3) If the circumstances described in division (F)(1) of this section apply, the director has
prepared a plan or amended plan for each of the districts involved that failed to obtain approval of its
plan or amended plan on or before the date required under that division and has issued an order to
each of them under that division directing the district to implement the plan prepared by the director,
and the director has approved the plan or amended plan of each of the other proposed districts;
(4) If the circumstances described in division (F)(2) of this section apply, the director has
prepared a plan or amended plan for each of the districts set forth in the determination made under
that division and has issued an order under that division directing each of the districts to implement
the initial or amended plan prepared for it by the directorIn the case of a proposed change in district
composition that involves the withdrawal of a county from an existing joint district, the director of
environmental protection has effectuated the change in district composition in accordance with
section 3734.522 of the Revised Code, including providing for the preparation and adoption of plans
in accordance with applicable provisions of this chapter.
(H) In addition to the requirements of division (G) of this section, if a change in district
composition involves the withdrawal of a county from a joint district, it shall not become final until
the county ceases to be a part of the joint district from which it is withdrawing pursuant to division
(B) of section 343.012 of the Revised Code.

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
36
Sec. 3734.522. (A) As used in this section, "deliver" has the same meaning as in division (G)
(2) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code.
(B) Subject to division (H) of this section, a board of county commissioners of a county that
is a member of a joint solid waste management district may withdraw from the district by doing all
of the following:
(1) Adopting a resolution declaring that the county will unilaterally withdraw from the
district;
(2) Providing the notice required under division (C) of this section;
(3) Complying with the requirements under division (D) of this section governing the
memorandum of understanding.
(C) Upon adopting the resolution under division (B) of this section, the board shall deliver a
copy of it to the board of directors of the district. Upon receiving the resolution, the board of
directors shall deliver written notice of the proposed withdrawal to the boards of county
commissioners of the other counties forming the joint district and to the director of environmental
protection.
(D) If a board of county commissioners adopts a resolution under division (B) of this
section, the boards of county commissioners of all the counties that are members of the joint district
shall enter into a memorandum of understanding within forty-five days after notice of the
withdrawal is received in accordance with division (C) of this section. The memorandum of
understanding shall describe the terms of how the counties that comprise the joint district will
operate as a joint district during a two-year period beginning on the date that the memorandum of
understanding is agreed upon by all counties that comprise the joint district. The counties that are
members of the joint district may include in the memorandum of understanding a reasonable
allocation of funds for each newly formed district that will result from the withdrawal to conduct the
solid waste management planning process.
In the event that those counties do not agree upon the terms of the memorandum of
understanding, the county that is withdrawing shall, within ten days after it is determined that an
agreement cannot be reached by the counties, request a court of common pleas located in a county
adjacent to the withdrawing county to hear the parties and decide the terms of the memorandum of
understanding on behalf of the counties. Not later than ninety days after the request is made, the
court of common pleas shall hear the parties and issue an order that details the terms of the
memorandum of understanding. The court may include in the memorandum of understanding a
reasonable allocation of funds for each newly formed district that will result from the withdrawal to
conduct the solid waste management planning process.
The memorandum of understanding expires two years after the date that memorandum of
understanding is entered into by the counties or the court issues the order determining the details of
the memorandum of understanding, as applicable, unless all parties agree in writing to an earlier
date.

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
37
If a board of county commissioners wishes to extend the term of the memorandum of
understanding, the board, prior to sixty days before the memorandum is scheduled to expire, shall
request the boards of county commissioners of all other counties that form the joint district to agree
to the extension and shall include in the request the period of time proposed for the extension, which
shall not exceed forty-five days. If all such boards agree to the extension, the memorandum of
understanding is extended for such time period as agreed to. If a court of common pleas issued an
order establishing the terms of the memorandum of understanding, the board of county
commissioners seeking the extension, prior to sixty days before the memorandum is scheduled to
expire, may request the court to extend the memorandum. If so requested, the court shall issue an
order either denying an extension or extending the term of the memorandum by a period of not to
exceed forty-five days.
(E) The director of environmental protection shall take all actions necessary under this
chapter to effectuate the withdrawal of a county from a joint solid waste management district
pursuant to a memorandum of understanding executed under this section so that the withdrawal is
effective upon the expiration date of the memorandum of understanding. The director shall begin
taking all such necessary actions on the date that such memorandum is executed.
(F) The board of directors of the joint district shall take all actions necessary to ascertain,
apportion, and order a division of the funds on hand, credits, and real and personal property of the
district, either in money or in kind, on an equitable basis between the district and the withdrawing
county, effective upon the expiration date of the memorandum of understanding.
(G) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on the date that the memorandum
of understanding expires, all of the following apply:
(1) The withdrawing county is severed from the joint district, becomes a county solid waste
management district, and shall comply with all necessary provisions of Chapter 343. of the Revised
Code and this chapter that apply to county solid waste management districts. The severed county's
members on the board of directors of the joint district cease to be members of that board. That
board's power to levy a tax upon taxable property in the severed county to support the former joint
district terminates, except that each county of the former district shall continue to levy and collect
any taxes levied for the payment of indebtedness of the district that was incurred prior to the severed
county's withdrawal from the district.
(2) The county or counties remaining in the former joint district become a county or joint
solid waste management district, as applicable, and shall comply with all necessary provisions of
Chapter 343. of the Revised Code and this chapter that apply to county or joint solid waste
management districts.
(3) The solid waste management policy committee of the severed county and such
committee of the county or counties of the remaining district may form or join a joint solid waste
management district or a regional solid waste management authority as provided in this chapter and
Chapter 343. of the Revised Code. However, in no circumstance shall the director require the county

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
38
or counties to form or join a joint district or regional solid waste management authority.
(H) In the case of a joint solid waste management district that is managed by a board of
trustees of a regional solid waste management authority and that is operating under an agreement
entered into pursuant to section 343.011 of the Revised Code, any withdrawal of a county from the
district is subject to the following:
(1) If the agreement governs the withdrawal of a county from the joint district, the board of
county commissioners of a county that is a member of the joint district may withdraw from the
district only pursuant to that agreement.
(2) If the agreement does not govern the withdrawal of a county from the joint district, the
board of county commissioners of a county that is a member of the joint district may withdraw from
the district in accordance with divisions (B) to (G) of this section, provided the board first does all of
the following:
(a) Adopts a resolution proposing to withdraw from the district;
(b) Delivers written notice of the proposed withdrawal to the legislative authority of each
municipal corporation and township under the jurisdiction of the regional solid waste management
authority. Not later than ninety days after the receipt of the written notice under this division, each
such legislative authority shall either approve or disapprove of the proposed withdrawal by
ordinance or resolution and deliver a copy of the ordinance or resolution to the board of county
commissioners.
(c) Obtains the approval of the withdrawal from a combination of municipal corporations
and townships with a combined population comprising at least sixty per cent of the total population
of the solid waste management district, provided that that combination shall include the municipal
corporation having the largest population in each county within the boundaries of the district.
Upon satisfaction of the requirements of divisions (H)(2)(a) to (c) of this section, the board
of county commissioners may proceed to withdraw from the joint solid waste management district in
the manner specified in divisions (B) to (G) of this section.
Sec. 3734.53. (A) The solid waste management plan of any county or joint solid waste
management district shall be prepared in a format prescribed by the director of environmental
protection and shall provide for compliance with the objectives of the state solid waste management
plan and rules adopted under section 3734.50 of the Revised Code. The plan shall provide for,
demonstrate, and certify the availability of and access to sufficient solid waste management facility
capacity to meet the solid waste management needs of the district for the ten-year period covered by
the plan. The solid waste management policy committee of a county or joint district created in
section 3734.54 of the Revised Code may prepare and submit a solid waste management plan that
covers and makes the required demonstration for a longer period of time.
The solid waste management plan shall contain all of the following:
(1) An inventory of the sources, composition, and quantities of solid wastes generated in the
district during the current year;

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
39
(2) An inventory of all existing facilities where solid wastes are being disposed of, all
resource recovery facilities, and all recycling activities within the district. The inventory shall
identify each such facility or activity and, for each disposal facility, shall estimate the remaining
disposal capacity available at the facility. The inventory shall be accompanied by a map that shows
the location of each such existing facility or activity.
(3) An inventory of existing solid waste collection systems and routes, transportation
systems and routes, and transfer facilities within the district. The inventory shall identify the entities
engaging in solid waste collection within the district.
(4) An inventory of open dumping sites for solid wastes, including solid wastes consisting of
scrap tires, and facilities for the disposal of fly ash and bottom ash, foundry sand, and slag within the
district. The inventory shall identify each such site or facility and shall be accompanied by a map
that shows the location of each of them.
(5) A projection of population changes within the district during the next ten years;
(6) For each year of the forecast period, projections of the amounts and composition of solid
wastes that will be generated within the district, the amounts of solid wastes originating outside the
district that will be brought into the district for disposal or resource recovery, the nature of industrial
activities within the district, and the effect of newly regulated waste streams, solid waste
minimization activities, and solid waste recycling and reuse activities on solid waste generation
rates. For each year of the forecast period, projections of waste quantities shall be compiled as an
aggregate quantity of wastes.
(7) An identification of the additional solid waste management facilities and the amount of
additional capacity needed to dispose of the quantities of wastes projected in division (A)(6) of this
section;
(8) A strategy for identification of sites for the additional solid waste management facilities
and capacity identified under division (A)(7) of this section;
(9) An analysis and comparison of the capital and operating costs of the solid waste disposal
facilities, solid waste resource recovery facilities, and solid waste recycling and reuse activities
necessary to meet the solid waste management needs of the district, projected in five- and ten-year
increments;
(10) An analysis of expenses for which the district is liable under section 3734.35 of the
Revised Code;
(11) A projection of solid waste transfer facilities that will be needed in conjunction with
existing solid waste facilities and those projected under division (A)(7) of this section;
(12) Such other projections as the district considers necessary or appropriate to ascertain and
meet the solid waste management needs of the district during the period covered by the plan;
(13) A schedule for implementation of the plan that, when applicable, contains all of the
following:
(a) An identification of the solid waste disposal, transfer, and resource recovery facilities and

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
40
recycling activities contained in the plan where solid wastes generated within or transported into the
district will be taken for disposal, transfer, resource recovery, or recycling. An initial or amended
plan prepared and ordered to be implemented by the director under section 3734.521, 3734.55, or
3734.56 of the Revised Code may designate solid waste disposal, transfer, or resource recovery
facilities or recycling activities that are owned by a municipal corporation, county, county or joint
solid waste management district, township, or township waste disposal district created under section
505.28 of the Revised Code for which debt issued under Chapter 133., 343., or 6123. of the Revised
Code is outstanding where solid wastes generated within or transported into the district shall be
taken for disposal, transfer, resource recovery, or recycling.
(b) A schedule for closure of existing solid waste facilities, expansion of existing facilities,
and establishment of new facilities. The schedule for expansion of existing facilities or establishment
of new facilities shall include, without limitation, the approximate dates for filing applications for
appropriate permits to install or modify those facilities under section 3734.05 of the Revised Code.
(c) A schedule for implementation of solid waste recycling, reuse, and reduction programs
needed to meet the waste reduction, recycling, reuse, and minimization objectives of the state solid
waste management plan and rules adopted by the director under section 3734.50 of the Revised
Code;
(d) The methods of financing implementation of the plan and a demonstration of the
availability of financial resources for that purpose.
(14) A program for providing informational or technical assistance regarding source
reduction to solid waste generators, or particular categories of solid waste generators, within the
district. The plan shall set forth the types of assistance to be provided by the district and the specific
categories of generators that are to be served. The district has the sole discretion to determine the
types of assistance that are to be provided under the program and the categories of generators to be
served by it.
(B) In addition to the information, projections, demonstrations, and certification required by
division (A) of this section, a plan shall do all of the following:
(1) Establish the schedule of fees, if any, to be levied under divisions (B)(1) to (3) of section
3734.57 of the Revised Code;
(2) Establish the fee, if any, to be levied under division (A) of section 3734.573 of the
Revised Code;
(3) Contain provisions governing the allocation among the purposes enumerated in divisions
(G)(1) to (10)division (G) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code of the moneys credited to the
special fund of the district under that division (G) of that section that are available for expenditure
by the district under that division. The plan shall do all of the following:
(a) Ensure that sufficient of the moneys so credited to and available from the special fund are
available for use by the solid waste management policy committee of the district at the time the
moneys are needed to monitor implementation of the plan and conduct its periodic review and

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
41
amendment as required under section 3734.56 of the Revised Code;
(b) Contain provisions governing the allocation and distribution of moneys credited to and
available from the special fund of the district to health districts within the county or joint district that
have approved programs under section 3734.08 of the Revised Code for the purposes of division (G)
(3) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code;
(c) Contain provisions governing the allocation and distribution of moneys credited to and
available from the special fund of the district to the county in which solid waste facilities are or are
to be located and operated under the plan for the purposes of division (G)(4) of section 3734.57 of
the Revised Code;
(d) Contain provisions governing the allocation and distribution, pursuant to contracts
entered into for that purpose, of moneys credited to and available from the special fund of the district
to boards of health within the district in which solid waste facilities contained in the district's plan
are located for the purposes of division (G)(5) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code.
(4) Incorporate all solid waste recycling activities that were in operation within the district
on the effective date of the plan.
(C) The solid waste management plan of a county or joint district may provide for the
adoption of rules under division (G) of section 343.01 of the Revised Code after approval of the plan
under section 3734.521 or 3734.55 of the Revised Code doing any or all of the following:
(1) Prohibiting or limiting the receipt at facilities located within the solid waste management
district of solid wastes generated outside the district or outside a prescribed service area consistent
with the projections under divisions (A)(6) and (7) of this section. However, rules adopted by a
board under division (C)(1) of this section may be adopted and enforced with respect to solid waste
disposal facilities in the solid waste management district that are not owned by a county or the solid
waste management district only if the board submits an application to the director of environmental
protection that demonstrates that there is insufficient capacity to dispose of all solid wastes that are
generated within the district at the solid waste disposal facilities located within the district and the
director approves the application. The demonstration in the application shall be based on projections
contained in the plan or amended plan of the district. The director shall establish the form of the
application. The approval or disapproval of such an application by the director is an action that is
appealable under section 3745.04 of the Revised Code.
In addition, the director of environmental protection may issue an order modifying a rule
authorized to be adopted under division (C)(1) of this section to allow the disposal in the district of
wastes from another county or joint solid waste management district if all of the following apply:
(a) The district in which the wastes were generated does not have sufficient capacity to
dispose of solid wastes generated within it for six months following the date of the director's order;
(b) No new solid waste facilities will begin operation during those six months in the district
in which the wastes were generated and, despite good faith efforts to do so, it is impossible to site
new solid waste facilities within the district because of its high population density;

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
42
(c) The district in which the wastes were generated has made good faith efforts to negotiate
with other districts to incorporate its disposal needs within those districts' solid waste management
plans, including efforts to develop joint facilities authorized under section 343.02 of the Revised
Code, and the efforts have been unsuccessful;
(d) The district in which the wastes were generated has located a facility willing to accept
the district's solid wastes for disposal within the receiving district;
(e) The district in which the wastes were generated has demonstrated to the director that the
conditions specified in divisions (C)(1)(a) to (d) of this section have been met;
(f) The director finds that the issuance of the order will be consistent with the state solid
waste management plan and that receipt of the out-of-district wastes will not limit the capacity of the
receiving district to dispose of its in-district wastes to less than eight years. Any order issued under
division (C)(1) of this section shall not become final until thirty days after it has been served by
certified mail upon the county or joint solid waste management district that will receive the out-of-
district wastes.
(2) Governing the maintenance, protection, and use of solid waste collection, storage,
disposal, transfer, recycling, processing, and resource recovery facilities within the district and
requiring the submission of general plans and specifications for the construction, enlargement, or
modification of any such facility to the board of county commissioners or board of directors of the
district for review and approval as complying with the plan or amended plan of the district;
(3) Governing development and implementation of a program for the inspection of solid
wastes generated outside the boundaries of the state that are being disposed of at solid waste
facilities included in the district's plan;
(4) Exempting the owner or operator of any existing or proposed solid waste facility
provided for in the plan from compliance with any amendment to a township zoning resolution
adopted under section 519.12 of the Revised Code or to a county rural zoning resolution adopted
under section 303.12 of the Revised Code that rezoned or redistricted the parcel or parcels upon
which the facility is to be constructed or modified and that became effective within two years prior
to the filing of an application for a permit required under division (A)(2)(a) of section 3734.05 of the
Revised Code to open a new or modify an existing solid waste facility.
(D) Except for the inventories required by divisions (A)(1), (2), and (4) of this section and
the projections required by division (A)(6) of this section, neither this section nor the solid waste
management plan of a county or joint district applies to the construction, operation, use, repair, or
maintenance of either of the following:
(1) A solid waste facility owned by a generator of solid wastes when the solid waste facility
exclusively disposes of solid wastes generated at one or more premises owned by the generator
regardless of whether the facility is located on a premises where the wastes are generated;
(2) A facility that exclusively disposes of wastes that are generated from the combustion of
coal, or from the combustion of primarily coal in combination with scrap tires, that is not combined

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
43
in any way with garbage at one or more premises owned by the generator.
(E)(1) The initial solid waste management plans prepared by county or joint districts under
section 3734.521 of the Revised Code and the amended plans prepared under section 3734.521 or
3734.56 of the Revised Code shall contain a clear statement as to whether the board of county
commissioners or directors is authorized to or precluded from establishing facility designations
under section 343.014 of the Revised Code.
(2) A policy committee that is preparing a draft or revised draft plan under section 3734.55
of the Revised Code on October 29, 1993, may include in the draft or revised draft plan only one of
the following pertaining to the solid waste facilities or recycling activities where solid wastes
generated within or transported into the district are to be taken for disposal, transfer, resource
recovery, or recycling:
(a) The designations required under former division (A)(12)(a) of this section as it existed
prior to October 29, 1993;
(b) The identifications required in division (A)(12)(a) of this section and the statement
required under division (E)(1) of this section;
(c) Both of the following:
(i) The designations required under former division (A)(12)(a) of this section as it existed
prior to October 29, 1993, except that those designations only shall pertain to solid waste disposal,
transfer, or resource recovery facilities or recycling activities that are owned by a municipal
corporation, county, county or joint solid waste management district, township, or township waste
disposal district created under section 505.28 of the Revised Code for which debt issued under
Chapter 133., 343., or 6123. of the Revised Code is outstanding;
(ii) The identifications required under division (A)(12)(a) of this section, and the statement
required under division (E)(1) of this section, pertaining to the solid waste facilities and recycling
activities described in division (A) of section 343.014 of the Revised Code.
(F) Notwithstanding section 3734.01 of the Revised Code, "solid wastes" does not include
scrap tires and "facility" does not include any scrap tire collection, storage, monocell, monofill, or
recovery facility in either of the following circumstances:
(1) For the purposes of an initial plan prepared and ordered to be implemented by the
director under section 3734.55 of the Revised Code;
(2) For the purposes of an initial or amended plan prepared and ordered to be implemented
by the director under division (D) or (F)(1) or (2) of section 3734.521 of the Revised Code in
connection with a change in district composition as defined in that section that involves an existing
district that is operating under either an initial plan approved or prepared and ordered to be
implemented under section 3734.55 of the Revised Code or an initial or amended plan approved or
prepared and ordered to be implemented under section 3734.521 of the Revised Code that does not
provide for the management of scrap tires and scrap tire facilities.
(G) Notwithstanding section 3734.01 of the Revised Code, and except as provided in

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
44
division (A)(4) of this section, "solid wastes" need not include scrap tires and "facility" need not
include any scrap tire collection, storage, monocell, monofill, or recovery facility in either of the
following circumstances:
(1) For for the purposes of an initial plan prepared under sections 3734.54 and 3734.55 of
the Revised Code unless the solid waste management policy committee preparing the initial plan
chooses to include the management of scrap tires and scrap tire facilities in the plan;
(2) For the purposes of a preliminary demonstration of capacity as defined in section
3734.521 of the Revised Code, if any, and an initial or amended plan prepared under that section by
the solid waste management policy committee of a solid waste management district resulting from
proceedings for a change in district composition under sections 343.012 and 3734.521 of the
Revised Code that involves an existing district that is operating either under an initial plan approved
or prepared and ordered to be implemented under section 3734.55 of the Revised Code or under an
initial or amended plan approved or prepared and ordered to be implemented under section 3734.521
of the Revised Code that does not provide for the management of scrap tires and scrap tire facilities
unless the solid waste management policy committee of the district resulting from the change
chooses to include the management of scrap tires and scrap tire facilities in the preliminary
demonstration of capacity, if any, and the initial or amended plan prepared under section 3734.521
of the Revised Code in connection with the change proceedings.
If a policy committee chooses to include the management of scrap tires and scrap tire
facilities in an initial plan pursuant to division (G)(1)(G) of this section, the initial plan shall
incorporate all of the elements required under this section, and may incorporate any of the elements
authorized under this section, for the purpose of managing solid wastes that consist of scrap tires and
solid waste facilities that are scrap tire collection, storage, monocell, monofill, or recovery facilities.
If a policy committee chooses to provide for the management of scrap tires and scrap tire facilities
pursuant to division (G)(2) of this section, the preliminary demonstration of capacity, if one is
required, shall incorporate all of the elements required under division (E)(1) or (2) of section
3734.521 of the Revised Code, as appropriate, for the purpose of managing solid wastes that consist
of scrap tires and solid waste facilities that are scrap tire collection, storage, monocell, monofill, or
recovery facilities. The initial or amended plan also shall incorporate all of the elements required
under this section, and may incorporate any of the elements authorized under this section, for the
purpose of managing solid wastes that consist of scrap tires and solid waste facilities that are scrap
tire collection, storage, monocell, monofill, or recovery facilities.
(H) Neither this section nor the solid waste management plan of a county or joint district
applies to the construction, operation, use, repair, or maintenance of any compost facility that
exclusively composts raw rendering material.
Sec. 3734.56. (A) Each county and joint solid waste management district having a solid
waste management plan approved under section 3734.521 or 3734.55 of the Revised Code with a
planning period of less than fifteen years shall submit triennially, on or before the anniversary date

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
45
of the approval of the initial plan, to the director of environmental protection an amended plan and
certification for the subsequent ten-year period or longer period on which the district's initial plan
was based. If the district's initial plan as approved by the director contained a planning period of
fifteen or more years, the district shall submit such an amended plan and certification to the director
every five years on or before the anniversary date of the approval of the initial plan of the district.
The amended plan and certification shall comply with divisions (A), (B), (D), and (E)(1) of
section 3734.53 of the Revised Code. An amended plan may incorporate any of the elements under
division (C) of that section that are not included in the district's initial plan or previous amended
plans and may delete any of those elements that were contained in the initial plan or previous
amended plans. An amended plan shall incorporate all of the elements required under section
3734.53 of the Revised Code, and may incorporate any of the elements authorized under that
section, for the purpose of managing solid wastes that consist of scrap tires and solid waste facilities
that are scrap tire collection, storage, monocell, monofill, or recovery facilities.
Not later than fifteen months before the required date for submission of the amended plan for
the district under this section, the solid waste management policy committee of the county or joint
district established under section 3734.54 of the Revised Code shall begin preparation of the draft
amended plan for the district. The committee shall proceed to adopt and obtain approval of the
amended plan of the district in accordance with divisions (A) to (C) of section 3734.55 of the
Revised Code.
If a county or joint district fails to submit an amended plan in accordance with this division
or fails to obtain approval of the amended plan within eighteen months after the required date for its
submission under this division, the director shall proceed in accordance with division (D) of section
3734.55 of the Revised Code. An amended plan prepared by the director under this division or
division (B) of this section shall incorporate all of the elements required under section 3734.53 of
the Revised Code for the purpose of managing solid wastes that consist of scrap tires and solid waste
facilities that are scrap tire collection, storage, monocell, monofill, or recovery facilities, except that
for that purpose the amended plan shall not incorporate any of the elements required or authorized
under division (B) or (C) of that section.
(B) If the solid waste management plan of a county or joint district was initially prepared
and ordered to be implemented by the director under division (D) of section 3734.55 of the Revised
Code or division (D) or (F) of section 3734.521 of the Revised Code, the director shall review the
plan triennially and prepare for the district an amended plan that complies with divisions (A) and (D)
of section 3734.53 of the Revised Code and is applicable to the subsequent ten-year period. An
amended plan prepared by the director shall not contain any provisions required or authorized to be
included in plans submitted by districts under divisions division (B), (C), or (E) of section 3734.53
of the Revised Code. Upon completion of the amended plan, the director shall issue an order in
accordance with Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code directing the board of county commissioners or
board of directors of the district to implement the amended plan in compliance with the

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
46
implementation schedule contained in it.
(C) A county or joint district that is operating under a solid waste management plan prepared
and ordered to be implemented by the director under division (D) of section 3734.55 of the Revised
Code or division (D) or (F) of section 3734.521 of the Revised Code may establish, under division
(B) of section 3734.54 of the Revised Code, a solid waste management policy committee and
prepare, adopt, and submit its own solid waste management plan to replace the initial or an amended
plan prepared by the director. Any such district may submit its plan to the director only within the
one hundred eighty days immediately preceding a triennial anniversary of the date on which the
director issued the initial order under division (D) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code or
division (D) or (F) of section 3734.521 of the Revised Code requiring the district to implement the
plan prepared by the director.
Upon approval of the solid waste management plan of the county or joint district under
division (C) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code, the director shall issue an order in accordance
with Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code revoking the earlier orders issued to the district under
division (D) of that section or division (D) or (F)(1) or (2) of section 3734.521 of THE the Revised
Code, as appropriate.
(D) When the board of county commissioners of a county district or the board of directors of
a joint district determines that circumstances materially changed from those addressed in the
approved initial or amended plan of the district require submission of an amended plan prior to the
time required under division (A) of this section, the board shall request the solid waste management
policy committee of the district to prepare a draft amended plan. Upon receipt of the board's request,
the committee shall begin preparing a draft amended plan for the district and shall proceed to adopt
and obtain approval of the amended plan in accordance with divisions (A) to (C) of section 3734.55
of the Revised Code.
(E) The board of county commissioners of a county district or board of directors of a joint
district may request the solid waste management policy committee of the district to prepare and
adopt amendments to any provisions of the district's plan or amended plan required to be included
under division (B) of section 3734.53 of the Revised Code at any time and without obtaining
approval of the amendments from the director. The committee shall adopt a resolution setting forth
the proposed amendments to the plan and shall proceed in accordance with division (B) of section
3734.57 of the Revised Code to conduct a public hearing on the proposed amendments and obtain
their approval and ratification.
(F) The board of county commissioners of a county district or board of directors of a joint
district may request the solid waste management policy committee of the district to prepare and
adopt an amendment to the provision required to be included in the district's plan or amended plan
under division (E) of section 3734.53 of the Revised Code at any time and without the necessity of
obtaining approval of the amendment from the director. The policy committee shall adopt a
resolution setting forth the proposed amendment to the plan. Upon adopting the resolution, it shall

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
47
proceed in accordance with divisions (A) and (B) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code to adopt
and obtain ratification of the proposed amendment in the same manner as a plan, except that the
board need not submit a copy of the resolution to the director for review and comment under
division (A) of that section. An amendment to a plan or amended plan that is proposed and ratified
in accordance with this division shall take effect when the policy committee declares the amendment
to be ratified pursuant to division (B) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 3734.57. (A) The following fees are hereby levied on the transfer or disposal of solid
wastes in this state:
(1) Seventy-one cents per ton through June 30, 2026, eleven cents of the proceeds of which
shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the hazardous waste facility management fund
created in section 3734.18 of the Revised Code and sixty cents of the proceeds of which shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the hazardous waste clean-up fund created in section
3734.28 of the Revised Code;
(2) An additional ninety cents per ton through June 30, 2026, the proceeds of which shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the waste management fund created in section
3734.061 of the Revised Code;
(3) An additional two dollars and eighty-one cents per ton through June 30, 2026, the
proceeds of which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the environmental
protection fund created in section 3745.015 of the Revised Code;
(4) An additional twenty-five cents per ton through June 30, 2026, the proceeds of which
shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the soil and water conservation district
assistance fund created in section 940.15 of the Revised Code;
(5) An additional eight cents per ton through June 30, 2026, the proceeds of which shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the national priority list remedial support fund created
in section 3734.579 of the Revised Code.
In the case of solid wastes that are taken to a solid waste transfer facility located in this state
prior to being transported for disposal at a solid waste disposal facility located in this state or outside
of this state, the fees levied under this division shall be collected by the owner or operator of the
transfer facility as a trustee for the state. The amount of fees required to be collected under this
division at such a transfer facility shall equal the total tonnage of solid wastes received at the facility
multiplied by the fees levied under this division. In the case of solid wastes that are not taken to a
solid waste transfer facility located in this state prior to being transported to a solid waste disposal
facility, the fees shall be collected by the owner or operator of the solid waste disposal facility as a
trustee for the state. The amount of fees required to be collected under this division at such a
disposal facility shall equal the total tonnage of solid wastes received at the facility that was not
previously taken to a solid waste transfer facility located in this state multiplied by the fees levied
under this division. Fees levied under this division do not apply to materials separated from a mixed
waste stream for recycling by a generator or materials removed from the solid waste stream through

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
48
recycling, as "recycling" is defined in rules adopted under section 3734.02 of the Revised Code.
The owner or operator of a solid waste transfer facility or disposal facility, as applicable,
shall prepare and file with the director of environmental protection each month a return indicating
the total tonnage of solid wastes received at the facility during that month and the total amount of the
fees required to be collected under this division during that month. In addition, the owner or operator
of a solid waste disposal facility shall indicate on the return the total tonnage of solid wastes
received from transfer facilities located in this state during that month for which the fees were
required to be collected by the transfer facilities. The monthly returns shall be filed on a form
prescribed by the director. Not later than thirty days after the last day of the month to which a return
applies, the owner or operator shall mail to the director the return for that month together with the
fees required to be collected under this division during that month as indicated on the return or may
submit the return and fees electronically in a manner approved by the director. If the return is filed
and the amount of the fees due is paid in a timely manner as required in this division, the owner or
operator may retain a discount of three-fourths of one per cent of the total amount of the fees that are
required to be paid as indicated on the return.
The owner or operator may request an extension of not more than thirty days for filing the
return and remitting the fees, provided that the owner or operator has submitted such a request in
writing to the director together with a detailed description of why the extension is requested, the
director has received the request not later than the day on which the return is required to be filed, and
the director has approved the request. If the fees are not remitted within thirty days after the last day
of the month to which the return applies or are not remitted by the last day of an extension approved
by the director, the owner or operator shall not retain the three-fourths of one per cent discount and
shall pay an additional ten per cent of the amount of the fees for each month that they are late. For
purposes of calculating the late fee, the first month in which fees are late begins on the first day after
the deadline has passed for timely submitting the return and fees, and one additional month shall be
counted every thirty days thereafter.
The owner or operator of a solid waste facility may request a refund or credit of fees levied
under this division and remitted to the director that have not been paid to the owner or operator.
Such a request shall be made only if the fees have not been collected by the owner or operator, have
become a debt that has become worthless or uncollectable for a period of six months or more, and
may be claimed as a deduction, including a deduction claimed if the owner or operator keeps
accounts on an accrual basis, under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1954," 68A Stat. 50, 26 U.S.C.
166, as amended, and regulations adopted under it. Prior to making a request for a refund or credit,
an owner or operator shall make reasonable efforts to collect the applicable fees. A request for a
refund or credit shall not include any costs resulting from those efforts to collect unpaid fees.
A request for a refund or credit of fees shall be made in writing, on a form prescribed by the
director, and shall be supported by evidence that may be required in rules adopted by the director
under this chapter. After reviewing the request, and if the request and evidence submitted with the

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
49
request indicate that a refund or credit is warranted, the director shall grant a refund to the owner or
operator or shall permit a credit to be taken by the owner or operator on a subsequent monthly return
submitted by the owner or operator. The amount of a refund or credit shall not exceed an amount
that is equal to ninety days' worth of fees owed to an owner or operator by a particular debtor of the
owner or operator. A refund or credit shall not be granted by the director to an owner or operator
more than once in any twelve-month period for fees owed to the owner or operator by a particular
debtor.
If, after receiving a refund or credit from the director, an owner or operator receives payment
of all or part of the fees, the owner or operator shall remit the fees with the next monthly return
submitted to the director together with a written explanation of the reason for the submittal.
For purposes of computing the fees levied under this division or division (B) of this section,
any solid waste transfer or disposal facility that does not use scales as a means of determining gate
receipts shall use a conversion factor of three cubic yards per ton of solid waste or one cubic yard
per ton for baled waste, as applicable.
The fees levied under this division and divisions (B) and (C) of this section are in addition to
all other applicable fees and taxes and shall be paid by the customer or a political subdivision to the
owner or operator of a solid waste transfer or disposal facility. In the alternative, the fees shall be
paid by a customer or political subdivision to a transporter of waste who subsequently transfers the
fees to the owner or operator of such a facility. The fees shall be paid notwithstanding the existence
of any provision in a contract that the customer or a political subdivision may have with the owner
or operator or with a transporter of waste to the facility that would not require or allow such payment
regardless of whether the contract was entered prior to or after October 16, 2009. For those
purposes, "customer" means a person who contracts with, or utilizes the solid waste services of, the
owner or operator of a solid waste transfer or disposal facility or a transporter of solid waste to such
a facility.
(B) For the purposes specified in division (G) of this section, the solid waste management
policy committee of a county or joint solid waste management district may levy fees upon the
following activities:
(1) The disposal at a solid waste disposal facility located in the district of solid wastes
generated within the district;
(2) The disposal at a solid waste disposal facility within the district of solid wastes generated
outside the boundaries of the district, but inside this state;
(3) The disposal at a solid waste disposal facility within the district of solid wastes generated
outside the boundaries of this state.
The solid waste management plan of the county or joint district approved under section
3734.521 or 3734.55 of the Revised Code and any amendments to it, or the resolution adopted under
this division, as appropriate, shall establish the rates of the fees levied under divisions (B)(1), (2),
and (3) of this section, if any, and shall specify whether the fees are levied on the basis of tons or

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
50
cubic yards as the unit of measurement. A solid waste management district that levies fees under this
division on the basis of cubic yards shall do so in accordance with division (A) of this section.
The fee levied under division (B)(1) of this section shall be not less than one dollar per ton
nor more than two dollars per ton, the fee levied under division (B)(2) of this section shall be not
less than two dollars per ton nor more than four dollars per ton, and the fee levied under division (B)
(3) of this section shall be not more than the fee levied under division (B)(1) of this section.
Prior to the approval of the solid waste management plan of a district under section 3734.55
of the Revised Code, the solid waste management policy committee of a district may levy fees under
this division by adopting a resolution establishing the proposed amount of the fees. Upon adopting
the resolution, the committee shall deliver a copy of the resolution to the board of county
commissioners of each county forming the district and to the legislative authority of each municipal
corporation and township under the jurisdiction of the district and shall prepare and publish the
resolution and a notice of the time and location where a public hearing on the fees will be held.
Upon adopting the resolution, the committee shall deliver written notice of the adoption of the
resolution; of the amount of the proposed fees; and of the date, time, and location of the public
hearing to the director and to the fifty industrial, commercial, or institutional generators of solid
wastes within the district that generate the largest quantities of solid wastes, as determined by the
committee, and to their local trade associations. The committee shall make good faith efforts to
identify those generators within the district and their local trade associations, but the nonprovision of
notice under this division to a particular generator or local trade association does not invalidate the
proceedings under this division. The publication shall occur at least thirty days before the hearing.
After the hearing, the committee may make such revisions to the proposed fees as it considers
appropriate and thereafter, by resolution, shall adopt the revised fee schedule. Upon adopting the
revised fee schedule, the committee shall deliver a copy of the resolution doing so to the board of
county commissioners of each county forming the district and to the legislative authority of each
municipal corporation and township under the jurisdiction of the district. Within sixty days after the
delivery of a copy of the resolution adopting the proposed revised fees by the policy committee,
each such board and legislative authority, by ordinance or resolution, shall approve or disapprove the
revised fees and deliver a copy of the ordinance or resolution to the committee. If any such board or
legislative authority fails to adopt and deliver to the policy committee an ordinance or resolution
approving or disapproving the revised fees within sixty days after the policy committee delivered its
resolution adopting the proposed revised fees, it shall be conclusively presumed that the board or
legislative authority has approved the proposed revised fees. The committee shall determine if the
resolution has been ratified in the same manner in which it determines if a draft solid waste
management plan has been ratified under division (B) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code.
The committee may amend the schedule of fees levied pursuant to a resolution adopted and
ratified under this division by adopting a resolution establishing the proposed amount of the
amended fees. The committee may repeal the fees levied pursuant to such a resolution by adopting a

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
51
resolution proposing to repeal them. Upon adopting such a resolution, the committee shall proceed
to obtain ratification of the resolution in accordance with this division.
Not later than fourteen days after declaring the new fees to be ratified or the fees to be
repealed under this division, the committee shall notify by certified mail the owner or operator of
each solid waste disposal facility that is required to collect the fees of the ratification and the amount
of the fees or of the repeal of the fees. Collection of any fees shall commence or collection of
repealed fees shall cease on the first day of the second month following the month in which
notification is sent to the owner or operator.
Fees levied under this division also may be established, amended, or repealed by a solid
waste management policy committee through the adoption of a new district solid waste management
plan, the adoption of an amended plan, or the amendment of the plan or amended plan in accordance
with sections 3734.55 and 3734.56 of the Revised Code or the adoption or amendment of a district
plan in connection with a change in district composition under section 3734.521 of the Revised
Code.
Not later than fourteen days after the director issues an order approving a district's solid
waste management plan, amended plan, or amendment to a plan or amended plan that establishes,
amends, or repeals a schedule of fees levied by the district, the committee shall notify by certified
mail the owner or operator of each solid waste disposal facility that is required to collect the fees of
the approval of the plan or amended plan, or the amendment to the plan, as appropriate, and the
amount of the fees, if any. In the case of an initial or amended plan approved under section 3734.521
of the Revised Code in connection with a change in district composition, other than one involving
the withdrawal of a county from a joint district, the committee, within fourteen days after the change
takes effect pursuant to division (G)(E) of that section, shall notify by certified mail the owner or
operator of each solid waste disposal facility that is required to collect the fees that the change has
taken effect and of the amount of the fees, if any. Collection of any fees shall commence or
collection of repealed fees shall cease on the first day of the second month following the month in
which notification is sent to the owner or operator.
If, in the case of a change in district composition involving the withdrawal of a county from
a joint district, the director completes the actions required under division (G)(1) or (3) of section
3734.521 3734.522 of the Revised Code, as appropriate, forty-five days or more before the
beginning of a calendar year, the policy committee of each of the districts resulting from the change
that obtained the director's approval of an initial or amended plan in connection with the change,
within fourteen days after the director's completion of the required actions, shall notify by certified
mail the owner or operator of each solid waste disposal facility that is required to collect the district's
fees that the change is to take effect on the first day of January immediately following the issuance
of the notice and of the amount of the fees or amended fees levied under divisions (B)(1) to (3) of
this section pursuant to the district's initial or amended plan as so approved or, if appropriate, the
repeal of the district's fees by that initial or amended plan. Collection of any fees set forth in such a

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
52
plan or amended plan shall commence on the first day of January immediately following the
issuance of the notice. If such an initial or amended plan repeals a schedule of fees, collection of the
fees shall cease on that first day of January.
If, in the case of a change in district composition involving the withdrawal of a county from
a joint district, the director completes the actions required under division (G)(1) or (3) of section
3734.521 3734.522 of the Revised Code, as appropriate, less than forty-five days before the
beginning of a calendar year, the director, on behalf of each of the districts resulting from the change
that obtained the director's approval of an initial or amended plan in connection with the change
proceedings, shall notify by certified mail the owner or operator of each solid waste disposal facility
that is required to collect the district's fees that the change is to take effect on the first day of January
immediately following the mailing of the notice and of the amount of the fees or amended fees
levied under divisions (B)(1) to (3) of this section pursuant to the district's initial or amended plan as
so approved or, if appropriate, the repeal of the district's fees by that initial or amended plan.
Collection of any fees set forth in such a plan or amended plan shall commence on the first day of
the second month following the month in which notification is sent to the owner or operator. If such
an initial or amended plan repeals a schedule of fees, collection of the fees shall cease on the first
day of the second month following the month in which notification is sent to the owner or operator.
If the schedule of fees that a solid waste management district is levying under divisions (B)
(1) to (3) of this section is amended or repealed, the fees in effect immediately prior to the
amendment or repeal shall continue to be collected until collection of the amended fees commences
or collection of the repealed fees ceases, as applicable, as specified in this division. In the case of a
change in district composition, money so received from the collection of the fees of the former
districts shall be divided among the resulting districts in accordance with division (B) of section
343.012 3734.522 of the Revised Code and the agreements entered into under division (B) of section
343.01 of the Revised Code to establish the former and resulting districts and any amendments to
those agreements.
For the purposes of the provisions of division (B) of this section establishing the times when
newly established or amended fees levied by a district are required to commence and the collection
of fees that have been amended or repealed is required to cease, "fees" or "schedule of fees"
includes, in addition to fees levied under divisions (B)(1) to (3) of this section, those levied under
section 3734.573 or 3734.574 of the Revised Code.
(C) For the purposes of defraying the added costs to a municipal corporation or township of
maintaining roads and other public facilities and of providing emergency and other public services,
and compensating a municipal corporation or township for reductions in real property tax revenues
due to reductions in real property valuations resulting from the location and operation of a solid
waste disposal facility within the municipal corporation or township, a municipal corporation or
township in which such a solid waste disposal facility is located may levy a fee of not more than
twenty-five cents per ton on the disposal of solid wastes at a solid waste disposal facility located

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
53
within the boundaries of the municipal corporation or township regardless of where the wastes were
generated.
The legislative authority of a municipal corporation or township may levy fees under this
division by enacting an ordinance or adopting a resolution establishing the amount of the fees. Upon
so doing the legislative authority shall mail a certified copy of the ordinance or resolution to the
board of county commissioners or directors of the county or joint solid waste management district in
which the municipal corporation or township is located or, if a regional solid waste management
authority has been formed under section 343.011 of the Revised Code, to the board of trustees of
that regional authority, the owner or operator of each solid waste disposal facility in the municipal
corporation or township that is required to collect the fee by the ordinance or resolution, and the
director of environmental protection. Although the fees levied under this division are levied on the
basis of tons as the unit of measurement, the legislative authority, in its ordinance or resolution
levying the fees under this division, may direct that the fees be levied on the basis of cubic yards as
the unit of measurement based upon a conversion factor of three cubic yards per ton generally or one
cubic yard per ton for baled wastes.
Not later than five days after enacting an ordinance or adopting a resolution under this
division, the legislative authority shall so notify by certified mail the owner or operator of each solid
waste disposal facility that is required to collect the fee. Collection of any fee levied on or after
March 24, 1992, shall commence on the first day of the second month following the month in which
notification is sent to the owner or operator.
(D)(1) The fees levied under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section do not apply to the
disposal of solid wastes that:
(a) Are disposed of at a facility owned by the generator of the wastes when the solid waste
facility exclusively disposes of solid wastes generated at one or more premises owned by the
generator regardless of whether the facility is located on a premises where the wastes are generated;
(b) Are generated from the combustion of coal, or from the combustion of primarily coal,
regardless of whether the disposal facility is located on the premises where the wastes are generated;
(c) Are asbestos or asbestos-containing materials or products disposed of at a construction
and demolition debris facility that is licensed under Chapter 3714. of the Revised Code or at a solid
waste facility that is licensed under this chapter.
(2) Except as provided in section 3734.571 of the Revised Code, any fees levied under
division (B)(1) of this section apply to solid wastes originating outside the boundaries of a county or
joint district that are covered by an agreement for the joint use of solid waste facilities entered into
under section 343.02 of the Revised Code by the board of county commissioners or board of
directors of the county or joint district where the wastes are generated and disposed of.
(3) When solid wastes, other than solid wastes that consist of scrap tires, are burned in a
disposal facility that is an incinerator or energy recovery facility, the fees levied under divisions (A),
(B), and (C) of this section shall be levied upon the disposal of the fly ash and bottom ash remaining

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
54
after burning of the solid wastes and shall be collected by the owner or operator of the sanitary
landfill where the ash is disposed of.
(4) When solid wastes are delivered to a solid waste transfer facility, the fees levied under
divisions (B) and (C) of this section shall be levied upon the disposal of solid wastes transported off
the premises of the transfer facility for disposal and shall be collected by the owner or operator of
the solid waste disposal facility where the wastes are disposed of.
(5) The fees levied under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section do not apply to sewage
sludge that is generated by a waste water treatment facility holding a national pollutant discharge
elimination system permit and that is disposed of through incineration, land application, or
composting or at another resource recovery or disposal facility that is not a landfill.
(6) The fees levied under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section do not apply to solid
wastes delivered to a solid waste composting facility for processing. When any unprocessed solid
waste or compost product is transported off the premises of a composting facility and disposed of at
a landfill, the fees levied under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section shall be collected by the
owner or operator of the landfill where the unprocessed waste or compost product is disposed of.
(7) When solid wastes that consist of scrap tires are processed at a scrap tire recovery
facility, the fees levied under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section shall be levied upon the
disposal of the fly ash and bottom ash or other solid wastes remaining after the processing of the
scrap tires and shall be collected by the owner or operator of the solid waste disposal facility where
the ash or other solid wastes are disposed of.
(8) The director of environmental protection may issue an order exempting from the fees
levied under this section solid wastes, including, but not limited to, scrap tires, that are generated,
transferred, or disposed of as a result of a contract providing for the expenditure of public funds
entered into by the administrator or regional administrator of the United States environmental
protection agency, the director of environmental protection, or the director of administrative services
on behalf of the director of environmental protection for the purpose of remediating conditions at a
hazardous waste facility, solid waste facility, or other location at which the administrator or regional
administrator or the director of environmental protection has reason to believe that there is a
substantial threat to public health or safety or the environment or that the conditions are causing or
contributing to air or water pollution or soil contamination. An order issued by the director of
environmental protection under division (D)(8) of this section shall include a determination that the
amount of the fees not received by a solid waste management district as a result of the order will not
adversely impact the implementation and financing of the district's approved solid waste
management plan and any approved amendments to the plan. Such an order is a final action of the
director of environmental protection.
(E) The fees levied under divisions (B) and (C) of this section shall be collected by the
owner or operator of the solid waste disposal facility where the wastes are disposed of as a trustee
for the county or joint district and municipal corporation or township where the wastes are disposed

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
55
of. Moneys from the fees levied under division (B) of this section shall be forwarded to the board of
county commissioners or board of directors of the district in accordance with rules adopted under
division (H) of this section. Moneys from the fees levied under division (C) of this section shall be
forwarded to the treasurer or such other officer of the municipal corporation as, by virtue of the
charter, has the duties of the treasurer or to the fiscal officer of the township, as appropriate, in
accordance with those rules.
(F) Moneys received by the treasurer or other officer of the municipal corporation under
division (E) of this section shall be paid into the general fund of the municipal corporation. Moneys
received by the fiscal officer of the township under that division shall be paid into the general fund
of the township. The treasurer or other officer of the municipal corporation or the township fiscal
officer, as appropriate, shall maintain separate records of the moneys received from the fees levied
under division (C) of this section.
(G) Moneys received by the board of county commissioners or board of directors under
division (E) of this section or section 3734.571, 3734.572, 3734.573, or 3734.574 of the Revised
Code shall be paid to the county treasurer, or other official acting in a similar capacity under a
county charter, in a county district or to the county treasurer or other official designated by the board
of directors in a joint district and kept in a separate and distinct fund to the credit of the district. If a
regional solid waste management authority has been formed under section 343.011 of the Revised
Code, moneys received by the board of trustees of that regional authority under division (E) of this
section shall be kept by the board in a separate and distinct fund to the credit of the district. Moneys
in the special fund of the county or joint district arising from the fees levied under division (B) of
this section and the fee levied under division (A) of section 3734.573 of the Revised Code shall be
expended by the board of county commissioners or directors of the district in accordance with the
district's solid waste management plan or amended plan approved under section 3734.521, 3734.55,
or 3734.56 of the Revised Code exclusively for the following purposes:
(1) Preparation of the solid waste management plan of the district under section 3734.54 of
the Revised Code, monitoring implementation of the plan, and conducting the periodic review and
amendment of the plan required by section 3734.56 of the Revised Code by the solid waste
management policy committee;
(2) Implementation of the approved solid waste management plan or amended plan of the
district, including, without limitation, the development and implementation of solid waste recycling
or reduction programs;
(3) Providing financial assistance to boards of health within the district, if solid waste
facilities are located within the district, for enforcement of this chapter and rules, orders, and terms
and conditions of permits, licenses, and variances adopted or issued under it, other than the
hazardous waste provisions of this chapter and rules adopted and orders and terms and conditions of
permits issued under those provisions;
(4) Providing financial assistance to each county within the district to defray the added costs

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
56
of maintaining roads and other public facilities and of providing emergency and other public
services resulting from the location and operation of a solid waste facility within the county under
the district's approved solid waste management plan or amended plan;
(5) Pursuant to contracts entered into with boards of health within the district, if solid waste
facilities contained in the district's approved plan or amended plan are located within the district, for
paying the costs incurred by those boards of health for collecting and analyzing samples from public
or private water wells on lands adjacent to those facilities;
(6) Developing and implementing a program for the inspection of solid wastes generated
outside the boundaries of this state that are disposed of at solid waste facilities included in the
district's approved solid waste management plan or amended plan;
(7) Providing financial assistance to boards of health within the district for the enforcement
of section 3734.03 of the Revised Code or to local law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction
within the district for enforcing anti-littering laws and ordinances;
(8) Providing financial assistance to boards of health of health districts within the district
that are on the approved list under section 3734.08 of the Revised Code to defray the costs to the
health districts for the participation of their employees responsible for enforcement of the solid
waste provisions of this chapter and rules adopted and orders and terms and conditions of permits,
licenses, and variances issued under those provisions in the training and certification program as
required by rules adopted under division (L) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code;
(9) Providing financial assistance to individual municipal corporations and townships within
the district to defray their added costs of maintaining roads and other public facilities and of
providing emergency and other public services resulting from the location and operation within their
boundaries of a composting, energy or resource recovery, incineration, or recycling facility that
either is owned by the district or is furnishing solid waste management facility or recycling services
to the district pursuant to a contract or agreement with the board of county commissioners or
directors of the district;
(10) Payment of any expenses that are agreed to, awarded, or ordered to be paid under
section 3734.35 of the Revised Code and of any administrative costs incurred pursuant to that
section. In the case of a joint solid waste management district, if the board of county commissioners
of one of the counties in the district is negotiating on behalf of affected communities, as defined in
that section, in that county, the board shall obtain the approval of the board of directors of the district
in order to expend moneys for administrative costs incurred.
(11) Providing financial assistance to individual counties, boards of health, municipal
corporations, and townships for the costs of mitigating impacts to public health, safety, and welfare
of solid waste disposal or transfer facilities within the applicable political subdivision.
Prior to the approval of the district's solid waste management plan under section 3734.55 of
the Revised Code, moneys in the special fund of the district arising from the fees shall be expended
for those purposes in the manner prescribed by the solid waste management policy committee by

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
57
resolution.
Notwithstanding division (G)(6) of this section as it existed prior to October 29, 1993, or any
provision in a district's solid waste management plan prepared in accordance with division (B)(2)(e)
of section 3734.53 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to that date, any moneys arising from the
fees levied under division (B)(3) of this section prior to January 1, 1994, may be expended for any of
the purposes authorized in divisions (G)(1) to (10) of this section.
(H) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code
prescribing procedures for collecting and forwarding the fees levied under divisions (B) and (C) of
this section to the boards of county commissioners or directors of county or joint solid waste
management districts and to the treasurers or other officers of municipal corporations and the fiscal
officers of townships. The rules also shall prescribe the dates for forwarding the fees to the boards
and officials and may prescribe any other requirements the director considers necessary or
appropriate to implement and administer divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section.
Sec. 3734.574. (A)(1) A county or joint solid waste management district that is levying fees
under division (B) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code on October 29, 1993, pursuant to a
resolution adopted under that division and former Section 25 of Am. Sub. S.B. 359 of the 119th
general assembly, or one that is levying those fees pursuant to such a resolution and for which the
director of environmental protection disapproves the initial solid waste management plan of the
district under section 3734.55 of the Revised Code on or after October 29, 1993, may continue to
levey levy those fees until the district abolishes them under division (D) of this section, the director
issues an order under division (F) of this section requiring the district to cease levying the fees, or
the district obtains approval of its own plan under section 3734.521 or 3734.56 of the Revised Code
and collection of the fees established in the approved plan commences in accordance with division
(B) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code.
(2) A county or joint solid waste management district that is levying fees under division (B)
of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code or division (A) of section 3734.573 of the Revised Code
under an initial or amended solid waste management plan approved under section 3734.521,
3734.55, or 3734.56 of the Revised Code when the director issues an order under division (D) or (F)
of section 3734.521 of the Revised Code or division (A) or (B) of section 3734.56 of the Revised
Code requiring the district to implement an amended plan prepared by the director, may continue to
levy those fees until the district abolishes them under division (D) of this section, the director issues
an order under division (F) of this section requiring the district to cease levying the fees, or the
district obtains approval of its own plan or amended plan under section 3734.521 or 3734.56 of the
Revised Code and collection of the fees established in the approved plan or amended plan
commences in accordance with division (B) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code.
(B) The solid waste management policy committee of a county or joint district described in
division (A)(1) of this section may a levy a fee under division (A) of section 3734.573 of the
Revised Code by adopting and obtaining ratification of a resolution establishing the amount of the

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
58
fee. The policy committee of such a district that, after December 1, 1993, concurrently proposes to
levy a fee under division (A) of section 3734.573 of the Revised Code and to amend the fees that the
district is levying under division (B) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code may adopt and obtain
ratification of one resolution to do both. A county or joint district that is ordered under division (D)
or (F) of section 3734.521 of the Revised Code to implement an initial plan prepared by the director
may levy fees under division (B) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code or division (A) of section
3734.573 of the Revised Code by adopting and obtaining ratification of a resolution specifying
which of the fees are to be levied and their amounts. The requirements and procedures set forth in
division (B) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code governing the adoption of resolutions levying
fees under that division, the ratification of those resolutions, and the notification of owners and
operators of solid waste facilities required to collect fees under those divisions govern the adoption
and ratification of resolutions levying fees under this division and the notification of owners and
operators required to collect the fees levied under this division, except as otherwise specifically
provided in division (C) of this section. Any such district may levy fees under this division until the
district abolishes the fees under division (D) of this section, the director issues an order under
division (F) of this section requiring the district to cease levying the fees, or the district obtains
approval of its own plan or amended plan under section 3734.521 or 3734.56 of the Revised Code
and collection of the fees established in the approved plan or amended plan commences in
accordance with division (B) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code.
(C) Any resolution adopted under division (B) of this section that proposes to levy a fee
under division (A) of section 3734.573 of the Revised Code that exceeds five dollars per ton shall be
ratified in accordance with the provisions of division (B) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code,
except that such a resolution shall be approved by a combination of municipal corporations and
townships with a combined population within the boundaries of the district comprising at least
seventy-five per cent, rather than at least sixty per cent, of the total population of the district.
(D) The policy committee of a county or joint district may amend fees levied by the district
under division (A) or (B) of this section by adopting and obtaining ratification of a resolution
establishing the proposed amount of the amended fees. The committee may abolish any of those fees
or any amended fees established under this division by adopting and obtaining ratification of a
resolution repealing them. A district that is proposing at the same time to amend or abolish the fees
levied under divisions (A) and (B) of this section may adopt one resolution proposing the
amendment or repeal of all of the fees. The requirements and procedures under division (B) and, if
applicable, division (C) of this section govern the adoption and ratification of a resolution authorized
to be adopted under this division and the notification of owners and operators of solid waste
facilities required to collect the fees. Collection of the fees so amended or abolished commences or
ceases in accordance with division (B) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code.
(E) Not later than thirty days before the beginning of each calendar quarter, the board of
county commissioners or board of directors of a district that is levying fees under division (A) or (B)

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
59
of this section shall submit to the director a proposed budget for the expenditure of moneys from the
special fund of the district created under division (G) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code. The
proposed budget shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the director.
The director may disapprove in whole or in part such a proposed quarterly budget for any of
the following reasons:
(1) The proposed budget includes expenditures for any purpose other than those authorized
under divisions (G)(1) to (10)division (G) of section 3734.57 of the Revised Code;
(2) The director reasonably estimates that there will be insufficient moneys in the special
fund created to meet the proposed expenditures;
(3) The board failed to submit the proposed budget to the director at least thirty days prior to
the beginning of the calendar quarter to which it pertains;
(4) The board failed to submit the latest report of quarterly expenditures from the fund that it
was required to submit under section 3734.575 of the Revised Code within thirty days after the end
of the calendar quarter to which it pertains;
(5) The district is materially failing to comply with the implementation schedule contained in
the plan or amended plan of the district prepared and ordered to be implemented under section
3734.521, 3734.55, or 3734.56 of the Revised Code;
(6) There have been repeated inconsistencies between the expenditures projected in the
proposed budgets submitted under division (E) of this section and actual expenditures from the fund.
If the director does not disapprove a proposed quarterly budget prior to the first day of the
calendar quarter to which it pertains, it is conclusively presumed that the proposed budget has not
been disapproved.
Nothing in division (E) of this section precludes the board of county commissioners or
directors of a district from making necessary expenditures to meet unforeseen circumstances that
occur during a calendar quarter that were not provided for in the proposed budget for that quarter.
Prior to making any such expenditure, the board shall notify the director of the nature of the
unforeseen circumstances and of the amount of the expenditure needed to meet them. The board
shall include an explanation of the nature of the unforeseen circumstances and of the necessity and
amount of the expenditures to meet them in the quarterly expenditure report for the quarter in which
the expenditures were made that is submitted to the director under section 3734.575 of the Revised
Code.
(F) If the director finds that the board of county commissioners or directors of a district that
is levying fees under division (A) or (B) of this section is in material and continued noncompliance
with the implementation schedule contained in the plan or amended plan of the district prepared and
ordered to be implemented under section 3734.521, 3734.55, or 3734.56 of the Revised Code, or if
repeated whole or partial disapprovals of the proposed quarterly budgets of the district have occurred
under division (E) of this section, the director may issue an order to the board terminating the
collection of all of the fees levied by the district under division (A) or (B) of this section.

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
60
Notwithstanding section 119.06 of the Revised Code, the director may issue an order under
this division or disapprove in whole or in part a proposed budget under division (E) of this section
by issuance of a final action that is effective upon issuance without the necessity to hold any
adjudication hearing in connection with the order or disapproval and without the issuance of a
proposed action under section 3745.07 of the Revised Code.
(G) The director, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, may adopt, amend,
suspend, and rescind such rules as the director considers to be necessary or appropriate to implement
or administer this section or division (D) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code.
(H) Moneys received by a district levying fees under division (A) or (B) of this section shall
be credited to the special fund of the district created in division (G) of section 3734.57 of the
Revised Code and shall be used exclusively for the purposes set forth in divisions (G)(1) to
(10)division (G) of that section in the manner prescribed by the solid waste management policy
committee of the district by resolution and for the purposes of section 3734.551 of the Revised
Code.
Sec. 3745.015. There is hereby created in the state treasury the environmental protection
fund consisting of money credited to the fund under division (A)(3) of section 3734.57 and division
(E) of section 3714.07 of the Revised Code. The environmental protection agency shall use money
in the fund to pay the agency's costs associated with administering and enforcing, or otherwise
conducting activities under, this chapter and Chapters 3704., 3734., 3746., 3747., 3748., 3750.,
3751., 3752., 3753., 5709., 6101., 6103., 6105., 6109., 6111., 6112., 6113., 6115., 6117., and 6119.
of the Revised Code, including providing compliance assistance to small businesses.
S 2. That existing sections 343.01, 343.011, 343.012, 343.022, 343.08, 3714.07,
ECTION
3714.073, 3734.521, 3734.53, 3734.56, 3734.57, 3734.574, and 3745.015 of the Revised Code are
hereby repealed.
S 3. (A) The solid waste management policy committee of a county or joint solid
ECTION
waste management district may levy fees upon the following activities:
(1) The disposal of construction and demolition debris and asbestos or asbestos-containing
materials or products generated within the jurisdiction of the district at construction and demolition
debris facilities located in an authorized county and within the district's jurisdiction and at solid
waste disposal facilities located in an authorized county and within the district's jurisdiction;
(2) The disposal of construction and demolition debris and asbestos or asbestos-containing
materials or products generated outside of the jurisdiction of the district, but inside this state, at
construction and demolition debris facilities located in an authorized county and within the district's
jurisdiction and at solid waste disposal facilities located in an authorized county and within the
district's jurisdiction;
(3) The disposal of construction and demolition debris and asbestos or asbestos-containing

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
61
materials or products generated outside the boundaries of this state at construction and demolition
debris facilities located in an authorized county and within the district's jurisdiction and at solid
waste disposal facilities located in an authorized county and within the jurisdiction of the district.
(B)(1) Beginning on the effective date of this section and expiring one year after the
effective date of this section, the fee levied under division (A)(1) of this section shall be not less than
thirty-five cents per ton nor more than seventy cents per ton, the fee levied under division (A)(2) of
this section shall be not less than seventy cents per ton nor more than one dollar forty cents per ton,
and the fee levied under division (A)(3) of this section shall be not more than the fee levied under
division (A)(1) of this section.
(2) Beginning one year after the effective date of this section and expiring two years after the
effective date of this section, the fee levied under division (A)(1) of this section shall be not less than
seventy cents per ton nor more than one dollar forty cents per ton, the fee levied under division (A)
(2) of this section shall be not less than one dollar forty cents per ton nor more than two dollars
eighty cents per ton, and the fee levied under division (A)(3) of this section shall be not more than
the fee levied under division (A)(1) of this section.
(3) Beginning three years after the effective date of this section, such fee shall be levied in
accordance with division (E) of section 3714.07 of the Revised Code.
(C) The district shall establish, amend, or repeal a schedule of fees levied pursuant to this
division in the same manner that applies to fees levied under division (B) of section 3734.57 of the
Revised Code. All procedural requirements governing the administration and collection of solid
waste fees levied under divisions (A) and (B) of that section apply to the administration and
collection of the construction and demolition debris fees levied under this section and collected by
an owner or operator of a solid waste facility or construction and demolition debris facility. Such
procedural requirements include requirements governing fee collection and accounting, filing of
returns, extensions on returns, discounts, refunds or credits, the conversion rate for fee collection in
cubic yards, notices, and district composition changes. Any notices required to be made pursuant to
those procedural requirements to the owner or operator of a solid waste facility also shall be
provided to the owner or operator of a construction and demolition debris facility for purposes of
this division, when applicable.
(D)(1) The solid waste management district may forward seventy-five per cent of the money
received from an owner or operator of a facility under this section to the health district in which the
facility is located, which shall deposit the money into the special fund established under division (A)
(4) of section 3714.07 of the Revised Code to be used solely for the purposes specified in that
division. If a solid waste management district does not forward money received under this division
to the health district in which the facility is located, the solid waste management district shall retain
that money and use it for the purposes specified in division (G) of section 3734.57 of the Revised
Code.
(2) The solid waste management district shall forward twenty-five per cent of the money

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
62
received from an owner or operator of a facility under this division to the environmental protection
agency, which shall deposit half of the money into the environmental protection fund created in
section 3745.015 of the Revised Code and half of the money into the waste management fund
created in section 3734.061 of the Revised Code.
(3) A solid waste management district shall not levy fees under this section with respect to a
construction and demolition debris facility or solid waste facility that is located in a health district
that is not on the approved list under section 3714.09 of the Revised Code.
(E) As used in this section, "authorized county" means a county with a population between
fifty-three thousand and fifty-eight thousand, according to the most recent decennial census.
S 4. Section 3734.56 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as a composite of the
ECTION
section as amended by both S.B. 153 and S.B. 165 of the 120th General Assembly. The General
Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the
composite is the resulting version of the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section as
presented in this act.

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

Sub. S. B. No. 147 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________